*Sagan*, does noone [link to source](http://arxiv.org/pdf/physics/0608059.pdf)?
The army has internal standards that are clearly going to be different from the civilian world's. I'm not saying they are inferior or superior, but they are absolutely not the same standards. The military has a completely different goal than a civilian for-profit company would.   I'm sorry your friend is having a rough time, they sound like they're skilled, but I don't see why the civilian employer is at fault here when your friend clearly got dicked around by his military superiors. They told him he was getting an AWS equivalent certificate, knowing full well it doesn't work that way in the civilian world.   I don't think this is a case of every civilian welding company and union unifying behind the idea of depriving experienced vets of jobs. That would be ridiculous. I think this is a case of not wanting to play by the rules of civilian life, and misdirected frustration over being lied to.
You comment stealer ;)
Assisting the witch, helping her turn everyone into a newt!
AVG is aparrently reading it as a false positive. A few posts have shown and only AVG is detecting it.  I scanned here with MSE and Malwarebytes and nothing came up.
I would say that in general, Reddit is a poor place to base big life decisions. 
Fuck. I'm to late to say this.
I'm not sure how to feel about this.  On the one hand, I don't want everything that is remotely dangerous to be banned.  On the other hand, this product was dangerous to little children with dumb/inattentive parents.  It's good that future children won't have their life cut short because of these magnetic toys.
Except it's not bit.ly, it's some other service, so the owner of bit.ly may or may not be a cock but this post doesn't move the needle in either direction.
Relevant username.
I completely agree with this, though you still require money to do higher MP.  The most I've ever sold an item for was 400k. I buy my armor for about 100k per piece, sometimes a little higher.  I've found some great deals, and I can get through MP2 with absolutely no problems. But to upgrade anything of mine, I'm going to need 20+mil. That's just not reachable for me unless I find something really nice.
He absolutely has. The Chargers would be a perennial play-off team and absolutely a top 8 team in the AFC yearly if it wasn't for Turner. It's a damn shame.   As much as I hate his face, I do want Philip Rivers to at least make it to the super bowl once. He's a tremendous quarterback when he's at his best.
I don't get why Opie gets so mad at Jocktober If a station is doing a $5,000 fugitive bit, WHO CARES?!? They're not hurting anyone, and they're certainly not taking any money or jobs away from the boys. I can see the problem if it was their PD telling them to do that crap, but otherwise it's a small-time jock. Just laugh at the absurdity of it and move along
This has got to be the stupidest goddamned thing I've ever heard of, what a fucking joke.
hard-core jazz heads shouldn't downvote. The only reason I ever use traditional is to get a different tone out of the snare drum but it only makes a difference when it's really quiet. 
&gt;I got 2 rares and a mythical in 3 games.   I played 11 games and got 1 rare and 1000 commons &amp; uncommons.   And somehow my allies who are complete trash get mythical items.   I like to believe there is a department in Valve where all they do is make my life miserable.
Ok, thanks anyways.
I've been waiting for someone to do this! Awesome! 
ive always liked these 
By being associated with all of you I am probably going to be downvoted too. damnit.
Dude - I found this post here like I find any other thread on reddit, get over yourself.   Would you kill yourself if you found out you were wrong? 
Hurray! Dumbass-buddies!
I put one of each, then i put another blue essence and has already turned resolute egg.
seriously - I love my skinny jeans and give 0 fucks if someone isn't smitten with my oversized ass in them. I'm smitten with my oversized ass in them, and that's all that matters. 
There are a few threads about modding phones for PowerMats - check out http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1515777 http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1387630 http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1278127 http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=832424 http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1557923 http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=1443123  The last two are my phone, and all the ones related to EVO 4Gs are my previous phone. I am thinking about PowerMatting my phone, but haven't done so yet. It would probably be easier to modify my case (Trident Kraken AMS) to work with PowerMat, and it would charge faster with less heat, anyway.
Ah yes, scientists are always atheists!  If that's what OP is referring to then... I don't get this post.
That's how a lot of reddit feels. "I can't imagine being on the same forum as someone with vastly different political views to me"   And thus /r/politics was born. 
So, so gross. 
I don't get it, what's bad?
I was more immature back then, but during Bush's first term, I was one of those people talking about hoping that W got assassinated, impeached, run out of the country, etc. I admit I was just being a Political Prick. My thoughts about George W Bush have changed a lot since then. I don't think he was a good President, but I have noticed that he did do *some* good.  Anyways, my behavior was unacceptable, and so is the behavior of people that hate Obama. The racist undertones bug me the most. It's as if this racism has always been with us, just beneath the surface, waiting to come bubbling up one day. After Obama's election, it turned into a fucking *geyser*. It is so out in the open now. It really saddens me.  Just my two pennies. Cheers.
You are better off parting with whatever avatars you have and making a new account. Fight your way to become verified and forget about trying to have fun during the verification process, just keep playing the next game and avoid getting furious and leaving, everyone is a smurf that thinks they are the only ones smurfing, and as result the team picks are terrible. Good luck my boy, and try to rage less!
You sound equally as dangerous as her.
Yeah you eat it out of the bag. It's really stringy and chewy, almost like a beef jerkey texture. It tastes really REALLY good, slightly sweet and salty. You can find these at most Asian stores.
Had an older fellow ask me this one day while volunteering.  To his credit, my hair was purple.  I am male.
Bio major here. Yeah the labs are a pain. Always leave class with a headache. At the top of the mountain I live on there's a memorial plaque with that poem on it, so it's always been special to me since it reminds me of home.
Take the McFadden for Decker trade imo
Well if both of you are using AVG it seems it's a false positive. Scanned with MSE and Malware bytes and it came up with nothing.  The other two posts are also with AVG.
Thought about becoming one?  
If you like that side of Guardsman Bob, I also recommend watching Scarra.  He doesn't generally talk about general attitude and such, but he explains in-game things more in-depth than Bob does. He constantly talks about what he's doing and why he's doing what he's doing.  He also points out how he could have played better, what mistakes he makes and how to take advantage of certain things in lane.  Unlike Bob, Scarra generally plays only mid lane and thus you won't be learning much about how to play other lanes, but trust me when I say that it doesn't matter what lane he plays, he is extremely helpful to anyone.
That's where theme decks have an advantage, they match a pattern. 
The independent voting thing really got me, what a terrible attitude to have. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1EBfxjSFAxQ
Blue polka dot looks great. Shot of it in the wild here: http://media-cache-ec6.pinterest.com/upload/198862139767046239_V0v4xeIk_b.jpg
I'm more hesitant because of the "make new stories or just abridge the books for a movie? they need to do the books! we hate new stories!" crap from fans is kinda off-putting.  Sure, we all love those books, but, well, is "make the books into movies, don't risk creating new stories because they might not be as good" *really* what we want from Hollywood?  Too much originality is bad because it might not be as good as what we've seen before? Really?
To argue that the Christian God exists is a denial of it. God doesn't exist. It logically is unable to exist as a finite and explainable being. To believe in His existence is to believe in an idol and ultimately to embrace superstition. God cannot be an entity among entities, even the highest. He is being-in-itself. The Thing-That-All things precede from. Thus the Christian God has more in common with Spinoza's God or Hegel's Absolute.
Completely agree with you. I'm a very insecure wife and for a while my husband would stop doing the things that I took issue with and it made me actually worse. It's best to stand your ground and do what you want to people like me. My issues are my own and shouldn't affect my partner. I've much more respect for him as well now he's stood up for himself. 
One could easily be enticed to partake in a hecatomb with her accompaniment.
It appears it's us versus the hive on this one. 
ol' gregg
I can't believe people like this still exist, what year is it now?
Four of my closest friends did something like that. Three of them were bananas, the fourth was in a gorilla suit. Hilarity ensued.
Anything less than 2TB is a VMDK for me, unless I HAVE to do an RDM.
It reminds me of a Doctor Who quote... a woman was delaying telling her children that their dad died, but is so frustrated that they were being happy  "You don't want them to be happy now because it makes you think of how sad they'll be in a little while.. but the reason they should be happy now, is that they're going to be very sad later"
[19.](http://i.imgur.com/ygVQv.png)
Throw some cold water on your balls, makes it easier to shave them too
Brilliant! sickened never made it in for it, packed I'm guessing?
I've noticed it intermittently, sometimes they load quickly and other times it takes an unusual amount of time before anything shows up. Just those dots twirling around endlessly. 
This reminds me of Regular Show for some reason.
Respect.
Except that it was Hallowing in a witches way, which to Christians was an act of the devil, despite the witches being good witches.
Which I will. 
who's the guy all the way to the right supposed to be?  
My girlfriend gets made if I don't stand outside in the cold and watch her drive down my driveway to leave.  
Let her down and calm her because she is like 10.
http://www.imgur.com/LQldE.jpeg  My brother and I are dorks.
I've yet to see another Sport Recife supporter here in /r/soccer (and don't expect I will soon, fans of top Brazilian teams are already hard to find, let alone a team that constantly struggles to stay in the 1st division).  But the reason I'm a fan is because of my father. He's been a fan of Sport Recife ever since the 80s when he used to live in Recife, and so has always taught me to love his team.
everyone is assuming an identity in hip-hop.  *Everyone*.  Everyone wants you to believe they are something that they aren't/exaggerate parts of their character.  It's a persona.  And if that person's persona is drug dealer, then okay.  The cars, the women, the money, its all there to create the perception of that rapper that they want you to have.  Its a masquerade ball to be totally honest.
Neither am I. I'm not going to lynch you for your choice of display.
Admit it, you want his D
Dude, there is no such thing as /r/classic4chan. The poor faggot had no where else to post his shit.
You sir/madam are awesome.
When I was younger, my dad was making fun of my haircut. I wasn't gonna take it, so I called out his receding hairline, told him he was going bald.  After a couple of decades, I'm pretty much inheriting his same receding hairline :(
It's okay, I work in a hospital. I can guess what went down. Glad you're still alive bro.
He somehow (seriously, no fucking clue) went 12th in my draft. It's a playoff oriented H2H league, so there's some value in gambling on him, but my jaw dropped at that pick.  If you're in an H2H where he can make a significant impact coming in late in the season I think he's definitely worth a flier there.
I used to wakeboard 4 years ago, before we moved and sold the boat, but I was never great. I was planning on getting some other boots from a friend also. Thanks for your input!
So what does he do at this place? Some kind of school?
They use it in therapy clinics for amputees. They touch the non-amputated limb while simultaneously touching the fake one and they have the sensation of having an arm again. It's apparently very comforting.
How is this bad? Its just more game time.
DISCLAIMER: Be careful not to read any additional propositions out of my following statements. When I say, for example, that "ignorance" is the cause of suffering this does not mean that I am making additional claims about what people are ignorant of. What I mean is exactly what I say **ignorance** - that state in which we do not know or think we know but are deluded. Not ignorance of a particular truth, but ignorance itself. This explanation has nothing to do with sky-daddies or floating pasta. This is more of a psychological analysis or philosopho-spiritual analysis of the "one path" doctrine as it appears in many religions.  We are all born into *ignorance*. That is, when we are born we do not possess explicit or conscious *knowledge*. We have certain tendencies and a base temperament but we do not even know that we have them. We are actually born largely unconscious and over the course of the first two years of life we gradually become more conscious and our sense of self comes online around age 2 (Source: Psychology/Neuroscience).  When we do become self-conscious and begin constructing autobiographical memories of our lives the manner in which we think about ourselves and our relationship to the world is primitive. Throughout our lives we experience many difficult situations that cause us to become depressed and in our depressive state (aka despair) we are more prone to *self-reflection*. We generally all experience a number of these in adolescence and childhood that we colloquially term "growing pains" (Metaphorically related to the physical condition by the same name).  By adulthood many of us share a basic model of reality with other adults that take various truths as axiomatic. Some of us go on to be scientists or philosophers and further challenge our world-models and self-concepts on the basis of great philosophical thought. However this process can yield a variety of different results just as typical involvement in society engenders and offers a variety of different personalities and viewpoints. Philosophers of a given age also tend to adapt their philosophies to the philosophical spirit of their time so they rarely push the bounds considerably enough to cause a major shift in perspective either in themselves or in others.  However there are observable changes in individuals from 18 to old age that are attributable to life experiences. Thus an individual does not stop experiencing "growing pains" upon reaching adulthood but is likely to experience them for the entirety of their life. Some worldviews and choices in life can cause a person to become more insane, that is, more delusional about the actual state of existence and thus experience more despair and depression.  The narcissist offers a good prototype of the individual bound for hell (so-to-speak). The narcissist cannot bear to reflect upon themselves in a worldview in which they are not admired and held in high regard. The emotional experience is far too potent for them to accept and instead they remodel their world-view to be consistent with the claim that they are wonderful. The narcissist's attempts to alter their own perception are well documented. The narcissist has a tendency to avoid criticism by avoiding close interaction with people who are critical of them. The narcissist has a tendency to surround themselves with people who are willing to at least feign admiration and approval of them. Many people are willing to pretend to admire and approve of the narcissist because they fear rejection and disapproval from the narcissist (their own narcissism).  The Yale professor of Psychology, Paul Bloom, said in his youtube lecture series on psychology that "You think you are terrific" and this is basically the core of narcissism. What Bloom is saying however is that we are all narcissists. The clinically identified narcissist may just be more bold than the rest of us or less subtle and nuanced, less capable of manipulating other people to view us as how we want to be viewed.  So what happens is people surround themselves by like-minded individuals who shower them with support, approval and praise. "Birds of a feather flock together". Social polarization results and people compare their own self-worth within a group by comparing their group-value against other groups. It is no longer about one person's individual narcissism, but becomes a mob of narcissists who have **ignorant** or **deluded** world-views.  This ultimately brings about the kind of chaos we regularly observe in the world. The multitude of wars and battles waged in the name of one delusion against another. *This* is hell!  Hell is an experience caused by one's own ignorance and unwillingness to fully determine what is true. It is caused by one's own narcissism or "self-idolatry" and allegiance to delusional self-constructs and one's relationship to the world and others in it.  Throughout a person's life their score on the narcissism personality index declines considerably. They are most narcissistic and most ignorant when they are born, but true conscious narcissism involving a self-model and delusional self-concept arises at age 2 and can either take a decline in narcissism or increase in self-concept clarity (i.e. becoming more self-aware or truthful) or it can go the opposite direction and people can become more self-absorbed and delusional.  The one true path is in recognizing this fact, that while people do grow and become more truthful, honest, compassionate and self-aware the processes (or "path") is the same regardless of how it is dressed up in ideology or language. And that path is of the relationship of one's own self-consciousness to the world, whether or not it is tending toward greater clarity and accuracy or toward greater ignorance and delusion.  I personally have studied many religious texts and find that, though often expressed in myth and fable, this is one of the things they all agree on when it comes down to it. But this is not the religion of those mobs of narcissists who call themselves "Christians" or "Muslims" and who start wars on the basis of those delusional self-concepts. This is the religion of Abraham, Jesus and Mohammed. 
No, you're thinking of confirmation bias.
hah, now I want to make a deck just to do this.
Thank you sir. RawrVapor isn't going anywhere :D I'm glad you like the juice! Nice to see some redditors getting ahold of the juice lol.
I was supposed to see them live with the Foo Fighters (my second favorite band) over the summer but I wasn't able to. If you want better songs by them check out the album Revolutions Per Minute.
I am? That's news to me. I'm *sure* a smart guy like you will be happy to enlighten me as to the error of my ways. I'll wait.
Stats for **[gay_when_drunk](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=author%3A%27gay_when_drunk%27&amp;restrict_sr=on)** on r/Loans   ---------------------------------------   **Requester Stats**   * [1 Loan(s) Requested](/req_) * [0 Loan(s) Paid Back By This Redditor](/paid_) * [0 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back By This Redditor](/unpaid_)   **Lender Stats**   * [0 Loan(s) Granted To Others](/offer_) * [0 Loan(s) Paid Back To This Redditor](/paid_) * [0 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back To This Redditor](/unpaid_)   ---------------------------------------   [joined: 1 year 2 weeks ago - total karma: 96](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------   [report link](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FLoans&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Link%20Reported%20-%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F12fgvk) or [send feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=interwhos&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Feedback!)   ---------------------------------------   [Hi! I'm the cRedditBot. I'm here to help protect the lenders that make this place great. Please keep in mind that I AM a bot, so you won't get a response if you PM me.](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------
It kinda sounded like you are upset about not having a Halloween costume :\ so I thought I would help you out. [you get to be sexy misty now!](http://i.imgur.com/DkvJG.jpg)
You forgot the flap lapel pin, and a bumper sticker that signifies your support for the troops.
yeah i got lots karma from those
soap :(
I'm actually ok with this... Doesn't seem all too bad to me really.
Anyone else think of that episode of King of the Hill?
&gt;Yes, but you learn as you go. Just because you did a few things wrong doesn't mean you should scrap the whole thing.   I don't know where people are getting this "scrap the whole thing" out of the whole content of his answers:  "I want to get them the resources that are necessary to lift them out of this water and the sand and the ashes and the death that's over there in the East Coast and especially in the Northeast," King said during a Tuesday evening debate in Mason City, Iowa." Let get people what they need but minimize the waste and fraud. 
"I'd never want to belong to any club that would have me as a member."   - Groucho Marx
Make sure to play "Call me maybe" and moon-walk our of the room at the end of the meeting.
I like how aggressive Roy has been too
Blue fears nothing.  He just gets bothered by things.
How do you usually introduce yourself? 
That's *so weird*!  Because I go on *reddit* to laugh at the...
BOTH!!!!!!!!!!!
Lessons learned....we don't forget that quickly and the days of "intent" not being questioned and expecting a less than enlightening response are over...both parties need to heed the admonition.
It was pretty great until that bullshit "You didn't build that" line. Why!?!
downvote for explaining why you downvoted
Glad to help. I mostly just wanted to make sure no one else got blindsided like I did. Now I know.
It sounds like you're using something [like these](http://www.amazon.com/Cblwhl-Female-Piggyback-Audio-Cable/dp/B000I94FAE/ref=sr_1_2?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1351727795&amp;sr=8-2&amp;keywords=RCA+splitter)? You could try using them in line with you existing cables without plugging them into the subwoofer. If there's any change compared to just your previous cables, it could very well be poor construction.
This is my street!
Seriously! That sounds like a fantastic deal, particularly if the phone is nice.
Girl: Ripley, Maple, Sapphire  Guy: Trevor, Kent, Bentley
awww shit looks like protector is gonna be my jam
Listening to really good music and getting those goosebumps and chills
phffhvvvvv
I'm looking at 245W at $0.72 for LDK, up to $0.79 for companies with better balance sheets lol. That's per pallet mind you.   What I'm really looking forward to is sub $1.50/w integrated modules.  I'm also seeing a renewed interest in storage with these lower prices.  Anyone care to share their module costs?
I agree with what combatdave says, the italics is ugly and the wobbly effect causes the text/sliders to touch and it looks weird.  the effects seem to animate a bit slow. couldn't hurt to speed it up more.
Stevan Ridley. 
[Strong enough to do this.](http://silentlocations.files.wordpress.com/2012/03/alley-pan-small1.jpg)
i'll be able to tell you if it would or not, but i'd need to skip out on my meds for a couple days to actually seize.
Yes.  For all of it.  Yes.
w h o s e  f u c k i n g  l i v e s  a r e  a t  r i s k   I always feel like they're talking about some other srs I've never heard of before
In hindsight, some cropping would probably have been in order...
Heute lerne ich, dass der Großteil der Deutschen blöd ist.
no. all the good dps skills are really high up in the skill tree and you'll miss out big time on the passive if you don't go all in.
He's actually not as good as you would expect.  If you land one fissure wrong, say goodbye to all that candy because your team can't get to it, and his stuns don't affect Rosh int he final battle.
I remember in my foolish youth - probably when I was 19 or so - I was leaving a bar downtown with some friends and catching one of the last busses out and jumped up and was going to try and pull myself on top of one of these.   Horrible idea.   Turns out they're not flat like I thought, but rather a thin piece of metal. Half my pinky was just there dangling. Bad times.  Lesson learned, though! 
Just FYI - see edit above - they gave me the old drive back.  Happy camper.
Thanks for the link.  Yield is close to home, they've had good shows in the past sounds like I should check it out (probably on the way back home)
Not gonna lie, if I were a manager I'd allow it. Better than showing up to work hammered.
I had installed ntp when daylight savings began in the hope it would automatically update date and time.I then uninstalled it when that didnt happen, but the problem has persisted (reverting back to FST).Is there anyway to contact whoever is running the time server? I have noticed that Linux is very 1st-world oriented, it seems very likely that Fiji dayllght time would not be updated.  **EDIT** I use "Date and Time" under system tools in the Apps menu to change the time
That's so *not* Lindsey!
Casual racism is best racism.
Shouldn't that be "Elementary, my dear Watson?" ;)
See Wycleff Jean for an example of the charitable sector fucking up royally.
I've grown up in a family of cold fusion believers and i want to believe in it, but i just haven't had a spiritual conformation. Do i need to pray harder? Am i masturbating too much so the spirit is ignoring me? What did you guys do to gain such a powerful cold fusion testimony? I still choose to believe in cold fusion, not because of facts, but because i want to.
You have no shame 
He talks by moving his hair in morse code.
I am so sorry for your accidental karma loss. A moment of silence
Why do you not already know basic facts about your girlfriend??? Go on a date (not the movies) and talk. May I suggest a nice walk through the park. Ask her her likes, dislikes, and how she grew up. Ask her what you want to know.
Nothing to see here, move along.
Right now, it's comission-based yes.
&gt;I weigh 125 and I am 5 foot 7 inshces. I eat about 3100 calories a day and do not gain weight. Before this diet, I was slightly overweight (165). I used to only eat about 2200 to 2500 calories but it wa smostly sugar. These ideas have been tested under controlled conditions. No study ever, even the ones that low-carb advocates use to champion their viewpoint, claims an effect of that magnitude. Every one of the strictly-controlled metabolic ward studies have found no difference in energy need or weight loss by varying macronutrient composition. There have also been lots of studies showing the inaccuracy of self-reported intake. You're reporting your calories incorrectly.
Which polls are you aggregating for this? Or are you only using Rasmussen? For example your Wisconsin numbers are at 49-49, but the RCP average is 49.8 - 45.8.
Wayyy too little information here for any real advice, other than to say you should see a therapist.
9
Good strategy. It's hard to read through so many appalling comments for the few useful and thoughtful ones, only to find that the latter are getting downvoted. Thanks for the tip.
Don't miss Rippy's picks!
[It took](http://www.answersthatwork.com/Download_Area/Fun_Page/A_most_unusual_paragraph.txt) you [an hour](http://www.herzogbr.net/fun/paragraph.htm) to [copy and](http://www.braingle.com/brainteasers/327/what-is-unusual-about-this-paragraph.html) paste [a well](http://www.answerbag.com/q_view/353305) known [paragraph](http://www.coolinterview.com/interview/24484/)?
Love the Three Dog Howl. Its really  neat they incorporated that into his Skyrim character.
[Thank you](http://memegenerator.net/instance/29374682)
Muscles Glasses from Epic Meal Time is going to be doing an AMA on /r/InternetAMA on November 3rd at 12PM EST if you're interested.
Lmfao
Some day, and perhaps right soon someone will be targeting the KOCH Family for assassination, and annihilation.
Artoo Detoo
The way it works is that the wheels turn the fan, not the other way around.  The wind starts by pushing you a bit, which turns the wheels, which turn the fan, which pushes you even faster, which makes the wheels spin faster, and so the faster you go, more the fan pushes you faster downwind.  Eventually the air resistance is high enough that you'll stop accelerating.
The shiny ones are black. 
I've actually done this before.  Mix being extremely hammered with dire thirst and you'd be surprised how much you can chug down before you realize its vodka. 
Why do you think most animals, even predators, avoid humans?  It's because over the hundreds of thousands of years, we've did our best to kill any that *do* predate us.  It becomes a selective pressure to not attack humans.
I can imagine this taking a weird turn. "Yeah, now get on all fours."
Life is good and fine. It's a dream I've had my whole life, and my life's been pretty ok.  I do have badish teeth though (the enamel in them is messed up, and has been my entire life. My sister has it to, and my dentist thinks it has something to do with pregnancy vitamins or something my mother did while she was pregnant), so I think it's just a fear of losing my teeth that I have, even though I've never had a cavity or any real dental problems.  I also bite the insides of my cheeks, so maybe that has something to do with it?
You are attached to your boyfriend and (I am assuming) love him, so you wanna spend as much time with him as possible. It's ok to want that. And all you can do is communicate your desire (which you have done). So yey.  Your boyfriend has his own level of attachment and desire as well as ability to spend time with you and right now your desire and his availability doesn't seem to match up. That's ok. That MAY or may not change.  Don't try to manipulate the situation or change it. Accept it for what it is and focus on YOUR reaction to it (the only thing you HAVE control over). Focus on what you have and whether or not you NEED more. If you need more than he can/is willing to give, then you need to find someone who can (maybe a primary partner for you), or maybe you realize that you are just lonely and that if you filled your life with more things for yourself, you'd be completely satisfied with the time you do get to spend with each other. It sounds like you usually like alone time, so maybe your desire right now is a manifestation of the fact that something else is missing in your life?  And a word on the "other side" of the coin: Being the primary in my own relationship I have to tell you that situations like yours SCARE the hell out of me. While I can UNDERSTAND your desire, I also don't see how *I* could be ok with my partner seeing his secondary every single day. That takes up so much of his time (he only has a few hours after work every day) that I would feel neglected myself. I don't know how your boyfriend's wife feels about this. Just saying that if you were MY partner's secondary and he communicated to you what he was able to give you from the start and you agreed and then you started "DEMANDING" more, that would be a dealbreaker for me. But you are not demanding. You are merely communicating a desire. So it's different. I'm curious to see what other ppl will tell you...
You forgot where you suck everyone else's dick to show your superiority.
When I was in high school all I wanted was a girl who actually wanted to do stuff. My first girlfriend was a lesbian, the next was transgender and used me as cover, and then my next one was asexual. Didn't get any until college...
it's now 'chainsaw'. same vibe, but the name changed a while ago ... what's an llcbo? if i were the lcbo i'd get all copywrite-infringement up on them
This pumpkin is a tight butthole!!
My cat Ritz knows that when the toilet flushes, petting time is over and promptly heads for the door.
i always wondered what the 'behind the scenes' of a cute kitten photoshoot looked like! literally herding cats...
oh, that's good to know. thanks!
yep, I use it as moisturizer. And have a separate jar for eating.
I really like the tattooed shorts
One of my old college tutors worked at Bullfrog with Molyneux he said that he isn't very involved in the creative process of the game and it mostly other designers that don't get the recognition they deserved. So in answer to the question very little will change. 
There is a reason that people like you get downvoted. You are sanctimonious and obnoxious.
[kinda like this?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uOYV2C7t6Xc)
Loose?
Do they still build cities in V? I remember enjoying that immensely back in IV. It was a settler-free way to get a city.
That BL2 is GOTY.
I'll take Jap Anus relations.  That's Japan US... Ya know what never mind
How do you do this?!?!?!?!/ I have it set to notify my email but I turn off email notifications on my phone because then I would get spammed all day. 
Lol. Thanks but I was kidding. I'm sorta stuck where I am for a while :P
I don't think that is a majority of people.
Huh, every time I've tried to use a McDonalds restroom they are always like "Gotta be a customer."  However, one time I found a wallet in there with no ID, but 300$.  
Question: Is it wrong to hit the report button on a post like "IAmA average guy AMA" or "IAmA 16 year old guy AMA"?
http://www.cisco.com/en/US/products/hw/vpndevc/ps2030/products_configuration_example09186a00808c9a87.shtml
The only thing I drew from that is that you play LOL....I'm more of a dota guy, not that there's anything wrong with that.
real men would have grown a beard instantaneously
"Oh great, my Cockburgler pens were ravaged by Fuckasauruses. Just great."
Not everyone can afford gaming rigs 
I've seen reddit defend fat people who had their pictures randomly taken many times, we know it's creepy.
I'm on eastern time but I can only play on alternate weekends but I usually stay up late so I can play with people from other time zones.
Humboldt as in Humboldt Saskatchewan?
I'm not buying the game. But I have no problem with those who do, those who are excited about it and those who want to post about it/discuss it on here. The virulent OP is welcome to go fuck himself since he's one of those hardcore gamers who has nothing else hardcore going on in his life.
I'm making the assumption your a guitarist, but here's the best tab I've found: http://www.gametabs.net/playstation/final-fantasy-8/fishermans-horizon/kabukibear  The sites got a load of decent VG tabs.
Would you say that you regret your lack of scanning determination? 
They'll leave you and go back to their station.  If they are a housecarl for a house you own, that's where they go.  If you don't own the house, they'll go back to the Jarl's place where you met them.
"I'd never want to belong to any club that would have me as a member."   - Groucho Marx
The Disklavier thing sounds interesting.  Could you go into a bit more detail?
I don't see the problem. Sounds like a good time to me.
I also have to worry about apartment checks, but I'm pretty sure we'll receive notice before such a thing occurs.
Is that a new guitar I see?
[Clearly](http://youtu.be/1n-_TVHEOf8)
We aren't going to lose Ohio and win Wisconsin.  Come on now.
IMO his points are... unconvincing.
This is one of my favourite books! :)
I felt, that each time I masturbate late evenings (almost daily), I would end up having really bad day afterwards - there's just no energy, you feel sleepy, and can't focus on anything. I would never have any good motivation to do something out of the ordinary, even if I felt I needed to do it. And even if I didn't have any sort of urge, or desire to fap, I would still do it. I've realized I have an addiction.  Tried to minimize my habits to twice a week, didn't work out. When I came across this board and other related material, it became easier - not twice a week, do it after 30 days. Right now, the goal has been pushed to 90 days/New Year :].  And there are benefits, if you are ready to get them ;].
[ZED?!](http://i.imgur.com/dlKwU.jpg)
Enchanted pork sword.
Im paying for the shipping?
Luke never wore his Jedi robe on a Tauntan?
That's why you pre-order the game, vote in the morning, and spend the rest of the day saving the universe. That's my plan anyways. 
In tf2 as a soldier: going around a corner in a corridor and you see your reflection in the mirror. You fire, and a crawket (crit rocket) blows you to smithereens because of the ensuing splash damage.  The sad part is I already do this. Pyro on my team with his finger on the left mouse botton and W coming around a corner into me. I fire, I die.  I suck. ;_;
So thats what were about.
Travis Oliphant, the creator of Numpy pronounces it "numPIE". I believe this settles it. 
Or you can do like me. Invite a couple of like-minded buddies over, buy a case of beer, and just have generally fun night :)
And just got my 7 with 16gb today for now 199 at staples. So add me to the list. Looked at the fire HD for a bit but the form factor seemed a little off for me. Also with the features coming in next update I am pumped!
yeah I feel like you are really on the clock (obviously it's an all-in LOL) but at least at a master's level if they can just delay you/ get faster infestors you lose horribly. But if the Zerg doesn't absolutely know it's coming it really feels broken as shit.   Another thing is that the build is a REALLY good build to practice key protoss army mechanics (proper forcefields, positioning, immortal control, reinforcing). The macro is fucking easy as shit so it allows you to put focus on the army (which is where I really suffer in sc2). 
Months ago, I made a comment that didn't even involve the usual twox hot buttons. I stated that I tried Pinterest, and didn't really like it because I'm not all that into fashion, nail polish, and arts and crafts. While many of the people who replied said its something nice to organize stuff or for recipes or if someone is planning a wedding, I had somewhere around 1/3 of the people responding to me that I need to stop thinking I'm a "special snowflake".
Nickelodeon is so different. I'll be the last one to complain though.
That was SirMolle, my CEO!
We've had a bunch of people bring in their servers either because their datacenters are down, or their offices have no power.  Not too bad for business to be up right now.
You should definitely upvote/downvote everything on reddit based on the assumption that it is a joke.
OP totally works as Tina Fey  This is because they are both relatively on the average side, who you know clean up real nice.  AKA like, 90% of all women, including me. I mean let's be real, Tina Fey is NOT knockout without any makeup/hair/wardrobe etc. Still a total babe though  This probably came out really offensive, promise I didn't mean it that way
you're gorgeous &lt;3
Then why take the job if you can't live on the wages? Oh, because you can't find any other job. And you need the money. So I am expected to cover your expenses because you took a shitty job. 
Thanks. My roommate did most of the work. Lol
*We're Only In It For the Money* is such a great album. 
No.
Sorry, I have some left but they are not the free ones.
Oh I don't think it's the only factor.  Maybe a very small one in most cases.  I'm just relating my own limited experience.  It's certainly possible that I'm misinterpreting everything.  
No guns?
Special Edition, now in 3D. Gorgeous!
But TT isn't in that location anymore.
I heard that! Waiting patiently (not) on a Wizard Labs order myself. 
https://encyclopediadramatica.se/Juggalo
Good on you folks :D
I must admit I was amused that someone took the approach of asking a bunch of people who are all introverted small talk hating loners for their numbers. Especially a guy in a female meeting and discussion focused forum.   It is like a reverse psychology strategy or ultimate shock card. Unfortunately, even if someone were to take him up on this offer I would guess it would be after months of consideration planning and debate so time wise it seems ineffective. (Each answer requiring hours if not days of careful consideration on both parts. His in order to keep the interest of the person he is trying to clearly learn from and her  in order to answer his question completely and in a quick manner to not waste words.) That is if she doesn't get sidetracked with something far more important or bored with the idea of introduction small talk. Maybe even far more likely; chicken out because it might go badly and it can't be planned ahead properly. After all, this person has shown to be fond of unorthodox methods of getting results.   An even larger problem would be that most of us dislike strangers and prefer to spend limited time spent talk with people we are already close to. Which I assume is what he combating with this greatly random and unique style of attention grabbing.   That said if someone actually got around to texting him the conversation might go something like this:   Girl INTJ: What did you want to discuss or learn about?  Male,21: Oh hi.  ....  ...  ...  (Hours later)  Girl, INTJ: Did you have a topic in mind?  Male, 21 : No  The end   Seems like a lot of effort for someone to go through just to chat up a random stranger. Especially for the sole purpose of learning more about this particular personality type. I would assume if he had any other method of research, maybe google, then he would just search for whatever specific info he needed. Since that seems like it can't be done since he clearly must be on plan c or d in order to use unorthodox methods. Plan a would be the obvious of google, plan b being youtube or any large video collection website, maybe even psychology websites like psychologytoday which can show in-depth studies, both cases of individuals and the group as a whole, plan c might have even been to go outside and look for someone of the female human like type that was sitting alone and go ask her whatever he wanted to know. Although I will assume that he skipped plan c in order to spare someone the stress. Plus if he had tried this method he would have realized that directly talking to a person with an introverted inclination might not work well if they aren't particularly there just to discuss what he has in mind so clearly he would never have made that request on a larger scale. Since it wouldn't work on a large scale if it fails on even a small scale. It is a real bummer that he most likely will get no results from such a clear cry for assistance in furthering his education on personality types in this particular categorization style. I mean if we take into consideration how nice he was with skipping plan c he must be a swell type of guy. Although I think he is just taking advantage of a higher concentration of more isolated women in the hopes that someone will want to talk to him. Completely missing out on the whole personality type he attempted this with.   Either way, I laughed. 
ummm hi is your brain working
Just so you know: you're not getting downvoted because it's not awesome, you're getting downvoted because it's the most ultimate repost of reposts. 
Looks like judge dredd revamp to me,
25 5 7
I'm guessing all the Ghiscari are probably going to be visually toned-down too then, eh? No fist-shaped Astapori hairdos for TV viewers.
I'm 4'11", so one step for everyone else is like, five steps for me.  Great exercise, really.  
Don't lie to me!
yeah. its crazy. just as i'm writing this, three asian girls just knocked on the door. yup. all dressed as cats.
Don't over think it
*This conspiracy's context:* **[My microbiology professor did the entire lecture like this. ](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/12eqaz/my_microbiology_professor_did_the_entire_lecture/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%2012ffvh&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/12ffvh/darth_vader_kills_microbiology_professor_and/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
They did not. They DID make it not as noticeable. As for me, I'm disappointed with the change from blue hair to normal. 
Have you tried CrossOver? It's actually completely free today! Google "Codeweavers"! It's free!
Draw me like......
Is this Haiti or Cuba?
And honestly, no one wants to watch that movie again.
You've got me wrong. I don't support the LNP, and I'm all for the *carbon tax* that morphs into an ETS, but I'm not fooled by fancy footwork and semantics.  What we have now is a **carbon tax**, and that's a broken promise. That's all I'm saying.
i will sell you the 16 pearls for ghast tear
Yeah I can get surf, scald, and toxic
Your mind = BLOWNnnnn^nnnn
Checks out, Americans find everything offended. 
I think that's the same reason it's important for atheists to allow their kids to celebrate christmas. Celebrate the fuck out of christmas, just let your kids know it's about goodwill and showing appreciation for your friends and family, completely separate from religion. 
Which is nice and which is naughty ??? They both look really naughty to me ;) i might have to deal out some spankins to both lol
Also cock face, "Yes I changed my vote" - 4democrasea, you can quote me on that.  Why, because I woke up and realized, like you should, that we have been duped.  I see through the propaganda now, to bad you don't.  Enjoy your frivolous life.
No problemo!
Wankers have "swag."  Real men have "style."
Emma Goldman has a few essays on authority I'm sure you'd enjoy. 
Stupid sexy Flanders...
Ohhhh. Now it all makes sense.
Wait for it . . . HOW???
They're kicking out Republicans????
You are totally bringing the awesome today, Vrgom20. :D  Congrats, nataliedanger!
&gt;I fully understand the beauty of RPGs is to give the players a sense or illusion of freedom with their choice, but when they simply refuse to enter an abandoned city where the entirety of the adventure takes place, I have no idea where to go from there.  Bring the danger to him - and give him a choice, fight unfavourable odds, or enter the city. Its very easy. Live or die.  &gt;I'm worried that in future sessions, I may drop other cues for adventures like screams or mysterious letters that lead to some destination that will only be ignored because they all seem "suspicious and dangerous."  I've had players ignore blatantly obvious clues for the piece of paper I gave them 6 sessions back that they suddenly remembered was left in a bag at the house they had obtained... Of course it was easy enough to use this to drive the plot forward, as it was yet another clue and piece of the puzzle, but I still face palmed. The only solution is to speak very clearly that - they are adventurers. Adventurers go tromping through old abandoned, trapped to the nines runes for the sake of finding glory and wealth. They do not go on adventurers to be pansies that wish they had stayed home knitting (not that I have a problem with knitting).  If they want a social based campaign - then they need to say so. Death in the party is going to happen sooner or later - and there is nothing more to it.
Ketchup covered raisins!
That was nice of you to edit.  Thanks.
The two on the right look alike cuz they both have boobs ;3
I would hope I was on the edge, and try to jump the fuck out of there.
[](/rlunasad) *Doubts linger in mind*  *But without humor, poems lie*  *Back to Hitler jokes*
No, everyone hates the Yankees because they win championships just about every other year. We hate the Cowboys because they *act* like they win championships every other year.
Went to the Bears 2006 NFC championship game against the saints.
http://i.imgur.com/ahJa4.gif
Yes. I've been using it for a few years, and it's great if you get tired of games pretty quickly. I usually play a game for 3 or so days before deciding whether or not I should buy it. You can upgrade to have more games out at a time, and the longer you're a member, the better discounts on purchases.
love that Allen Iverson-esque ankle breaker from Hazard
I have no clue what you're trying to express. That approximating an ideological middle is a bad thing?
Dear Jupiter, Thanks for pulling all those asteroids away from Earth. I'll quit it on the Jupiter's so fat jokes. Thanks for keepin it gravitational. Peace!
Nazi
Yeah, NBC was there today.  I'll try to find a video.  It's a complete mess.  Roller coaster still standing, everything else looks trashed.
I KNOW THIS GUY IRL
dude spoilers!
Spit or swallow.
He has far better laning then most melee heroes. Get him together with any range Stunner and you own lanes even before 6.
"I want those glasses!" No you fucking don't.
*FART*
The field I frequent has water and ice pops for really cheap, sports drinks are a bit over priced and as far as food just packaged stuff like chips and candy. There is another field in the area that has a water jug set up at each dead box (mask off area) which is awesome because it is free and you don't have to worry about running out or anything. For me food is take it or leave it but I would consider food during a tournament a must have and seem to be a real money maker also. 
this is gonna sound stupid but it works when ever you are annoyed by something that would set you off.  say out loud in a Cartman voice what is making you mad and why it is making you mad it will sound so ridiculous you just laugh it off.
"*They told me college was worth it.*"
You could work for Disney.
It sounds like she just side-stepped going on a date with you.  Chances are, she's not into you.  However, definitely buy her a drink, chat her up, and if the night goes well, wait a day or so and when you see her again, say something like:  "Honestly, I was using your Birthday as an excuse to take you out to dinner.  I would still really like to do that if you are interested."
Dammit, I knew it.  He was in my graduating class at Cornell - awesome dude, born politician.
Uhh, Rotary engines are the exact opposite of everything you listed...
I admit defeat brother, somehow I got the idea that it did really well, it really did underperform. You could tell from the ads that they wanted it to pull in GTA/RDR numbers but it just couldn't pull it off.   Shame too, MP3 is one of the best games I've played in a long time.
Pretty much every school did the same thing...
Used syringes are the way to go, bud!
Depends on the day. I think things, on most days, would be more awkward than messy.
Wow there is a femi-nazi army out there, just downvoting everything. Wow!
I didn't know they were stackable! 
hahah thats messed up
I dont really have to be to the top of granite peak that fast..
Dammit that's all I'm going to be thinking about when I rewatch The Wire.
What a coincidence that your lecture was about that, because that's the exact same thing as mine. And I'm in a completely different country, so I wonder how similar our Chem programs are?
*Stay outta my country!*
You, the reader, are implying the tone in this case.  Why do you assume he's being a dick and not just saying. "Damn, that game could have been a lot better but I think we were a mismatch.  We are a little more experienced than your group" - He could have meant this or something else, but he only wanted to use 2 words.  You got "bg easy."  You are implying the tone completely and not looking at the simple fact that...it was probably a bad game that was one-sided.  It's just true.  Those games happen and I don't like it no matter which side of the game I am on.  Games where you are completely dominant mean that it was a bad matchup.  Games where you get dominated are bad matchups.  Bad matchups make for bad games.  If you assume he's just trying to be an asshole, it's probably because you have experienced a lot of internet assholes.  That doesn't mean that everyone is.  Benefit of the doubt is a good thing.
Your edit is correct. With iTunes Home Sharing you need to convert your media collection to an iTunes compatible format.  Beamer supports popular formats like avi and mkv
The closest I've got it to get one photo featured on a tag page. That only happened after I asked an editor (with similar taste to me) to check out my work. I'd like to know how to get into the inner circle of people who tend to get featured repeatedly.
Vous voulez dire qu'on prononce pas beaucoup des lettres... "veulent", par exemple  Edit: Et on a aussi toutes les accentes... je ne sais pas comme les utilizer... il y aura des regles pour ca?
Dry meads are hard.  They take quite some time for the honey to come back... on the order of 1-1.5 years.  I f you like dry wine, might just want to camp on this. Option is to stabilize and backsweeten half, bottle the other half dry and test those in one to one-half years from inception.  The semisweet/sweet meads are more palatable faster due to the balancing of the honey.  Alcohol comes across much, much, much more in dry meads, especially young, as there is no body or sweetness to balance. Did you drink it cold?  If the tannin/acid ratio seems right and the fusels arent in the nose, it just will take a little time to come around.
Forget about the robes.  What will the tea be like?
Girls who like knives?
gg tenshi.
Nicki Minaj is worse
Thank you.  Its exactly like you described.  I couldn't talk to anyone because once I did, I knew my marriage would be over.  I'm glad you got out of yours too.  Making the decision was the hardest part.
I'd love to. I've never had an offer, yet!
I didn't write that well. MR has said that the cap wouldn't apply to certain things, such as vehicles that encourage investment and savings. So loopholes will remain in place for those situated to use them, even though until recently he talked of closing loopholes rather than the flat deduction.  And I've still not heard specifics on what loopholes would be closed on corporations, to offset the 10% cut he proposes for them. Even though corporations are people, it wouldn't be practical to allow them a standard deduction...
No comment
the guy in the background is the best part
Many peoples' Facebooks are publicly visible. Doesn't mean they want random strangers to see it.
Become a professional masturbator.
Did you guys hear something?
&gt;somebody will be placed in the parking garage and he'll ask everyone for a jump as they arrive for interview, to see how they respond.  "If the prospective employee helps the individual, this shows that he is caring, empathetic, and willing to help a fellow human being, and, therefore, is not sociopathic enough to be a Wall Street banker. The best course of action in this scenario is to notify security to detain him and have him prepared for our daily human sacrifice to Satan, Ayn Rand, and Ronald Reagan."
Eating magnets just confirms that the gene pool needs more chlorine. 
So not only are you only providing anecdotal evidence, it's anecdotal evidence to the contrary.
I'm stealing this idea for next year.
Knock knock.  Who's there?  Control freak. Now, this is the part where you say, "Control freak who?"
I don't know what you mean
Does it take off its giraffe mask to dramatically reveal it was a giraffe the whole time?
Yeah, that's much more agreeable.   I think this is still a case of "but they started it". Given the freaky shit that comes from Autism Speaks, I think the attitudes are somewhat justified. The protesters aren't resisting society and integration; they're resisting the threat of an organization trying to valiantly save humanity from the *terrible evil that is autism*. It's basically "Fuck you! You're not talking about my difficulties, you're talking about *me!*" So they may seem to be over-doing it a bit, but think of it like a gay-pride parade. The goal is not to go around flaming all the time, but rather to throw it in people's faces occasionally to un-stigmatize it after years of malicious propaganda.
I should walk up to some girls and say "wanna smell my nut essence?".
if you have no intention of raping her you shouldn't give a fuck. should a guy with a hoodie up at night to keep his face and head warm take it off so that you can feel at ease? no   what's the point in living in a (supposedly) free society if people's irrational fears can control your actions in such a fashion
No chance. 
He's not a police officer.
That is where I disagree. For me anytime the govt uses force on a citizen when that citizen has not enacted force on another party you've robbed that person of freedom. The majority should not get to choose what freedoms we have (although in recent us history that is certainly the case). This country is not a democracy despite what many people think. It is no majority rules. It's a republic and that means we have laws not the whim of a majority. Democracies inevitably breakdown into anarchy, which is something I do not support. However if people insist on taking away freedoms for comforts, please support such measures at a state or local level. The federal govt has its powers limited explicitly by the constitution, but that has been ripped to shreds for a long time.  Whenever you have the federal govt meddling you cause the whole country to be robbed if freedom because there is no accountability. With power grab after power grab we end up with dictators not presidents who issue executive orders and regulation through cabinet departments without the consent if congress. I mean during the foreign policy debate the candidates were asked if they'd bomb Iran. How is this even a valid question???  The constitution require congress to declare war but that has gone by the wayside and now one person holds all the power designed to be held by a large group of people. We literally have lost and will continue to lose all semblance of checks on power as long as this gross federal expansion continues. 
Indeed, but then perhaps with research there are major private examples out there.
have you *even seen* carbot's starcrafts?
Malooooooooooooooooo!!!
Come to think of it, my dermatologist tells me to take care of my skin above all else. I'm sensing a conspiracy here...
Stop labeling people. It makes you seem narrow minded.   You're missing out. Those type of girls are fun!
At least he came prepared.
Yes it is possible to have knowledge outside of evidence. I'd prove it to you, but unfortunately I don't have any evidence.
It's hard not to get tired of them just because of how many there are, even though the worst discworld books are consistently good while the best discworld books rank among my favorite books.  I haven't even read half of them yet, though I'd say I've read enough of them to call myself a fan.
Yeah id much rather have all my family and close friends know before Facebook, even if that meant waiting a while before posting it.
I never remember to get extra cheap stuff and blow through my deep conditioning stuff really fast -.-
Thank you. :)
My win rate with Mafia Graves is pretty even. Riot Graves, however -- I tend to funnel the rage of them trying to kill my father (who looks EXACTLY like Graves in that skin) as I play to uphold my honor...  Except for the last game I played as him because I was being a dork.
$50. It was in the same neighborhood that Kevin Durant from the Oklahoma City Thunder lives in.
Where were you bussing that you didn't get tip outs at the end of the night? The three restaurants I've worked in we had to tip out 2% of sales to the bussers, hosts, and bartenders each. Usually it was $5-10 per server, so you could easily make and extra $40-100. But then hourly was cut down. 
It really depends on if you're willing to root and how much you like the features on each phone. What makes the note 2 so great is the S-pen features. So if that stuff really interests you, go for the note 2. If you really need more space, but don't want the size of the N2, go for the S3 instead. The Nexus 4 is also great though, because of the price difference, and easy updates without rooting. Go with which one you like best, because it's your phone.
I was raised a Jewish Conservative/borderline Orthodox, but I don't believe in god anymore. I still keep Kosher and observe some major holidays out of respect for my parents, but that's a little more complicated. I can say more if there's an interest.  I still have a lot of love for the Jewish community, though. One of the warmest people in my childhood was my Rabbi's brother, who helped prepare me for my Bar Mitzvah. If you remove the religious and sexist components of Orthodox culture, I'd say their community has some of the bro-ist and most awesome people I've ever met.   My brother (also gay) has a hatred for the Orthodox community, though. Just last month, we were on a plane to Israel around the time of the High Holidays, and the plane was full of religious people. He could hardly hold back his disgust. I said something about his facial expressions, and when he asked why I cared, I said "We should show them the acceptance we want to be shown." He stopped, but I can tell he still broods with that hatred when he sees them.
Edit: auto correct fucked my title. He got his camaro reposessed.
Well - no matter what happens, know that you're ahead a fair bit of the population simply by caring early on. :) Good luck! 
They were only down 24-13 against the Bucs at the half, and were up 27-17 against the Browns at the half.   And you can't gauge the Giants the way they've played in the division, can you? How many times have you gone into a divisional game expecting a blowout win and only have the other team play a million times better than they have all season?
I am at my good level
If follows a normal pattern of the body failing.
"I'm gonna double-kill you! Then I'm gonna bury you in a shallow grave! Then I'm gonna dig you up and kill you again: that's the beauty of a shallow grave!"  Homer Simpson
Maybe you were just unlucky and it bugged a second time in a row.  Just keep restarting until it works I guess.  I can't imagine it being THAT large of a hindrance unless two champions are directly on top of one another.
I was kinda upset at the people doing her makeup. If you pay attention, her face and neck are two different colors. Whoever applied that foundation should go back to cosmetic school. Maybe it was my buddy's 240hz TV, but the shit was way noticeable. 
im back in the room with you communicating 
[&gt;Do you think i should cancell my school and be a proffesional ? im at 1500 already lol](http://images.wikia.com/dragonage/images/2/2a/Anchorman-well-that-escalated-quickly.jpg)
... Who the fuck smokes on a lamp post?
SO PISSED THAT DAARIO IS WHITE
THIS IS AMAZING.
Just realized OP lives under a rock. Rererepost at least. 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JTsbBPEFHq8&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player
Be nice to Detroit. Those people are living in Mad Max times.
oh man so cute
So that's how you do a sock bun! Thank you! 
it's attached to your rod, MUTHA' LICKA'
Poopdeck agrees with this comment.
im using SGS3 with att , (stock, just rooted)   A. i did find the wi-fi a but clunky at times but haven't been using it because i have unlimited data. try doing some speed test in different locals around the house and might need this app [Wifi Analyzer](https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.farproc.wifi.analyzer&amp;feature=search_result#?t=W251bGwsMSwxLDEsImNvbS5mYXJwcm9jLndpZmkuYW5hbHl6ZXIiXQ..)   B. the choppy calls might be a signal issue of location(cellular towers) or the type of walls around. or you might have a bad radio (built in)  C. yeah for the battery, you have to turn off the apps that you are not using by holding the home button and swiping off the apps. Also try this app [one power guard](https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.onexuan.battery) to help with battery.  D. Yup buy better head phones. i got [munitio these](http://store.munitio.com/Store/Product/Sku/CPFA000334-01?CategoryCode=Billets) when they were on sale they are so Awesome or get wireless Bluetooth headphones.  and lastly try Google chrome mobile browser, its pretty good. i was using the default browser for a while and switch to GC, the thing is sometime flash movies do play with in the GC, but sometimes the YouTube app will launch in order to view flash/movies. well msg me if you have any more questions, i may not be very knowledgeable but it it helps a user. cool =D
Yeah, then go eat some more breakfast.
Last summer, it was extremely hot where I lived.  No A/C, fans blaring and I was sleeping naked (which I do either way) with cold packs and I was still too hot.  Sitting there thinking about how turning the pillow over to the cool side is awesome. Then it hit me! I'll invent a pillow that's cold and it will be awesome. Now if I could just name it something. That's it! I'll name it the Chillow!  Got on the internets, sure enough my idea and name was already taken.  TL;DR  Thought I came up with an awesome idea called a Chillow, idea already existed.
With out context: Whaaa? This is so obscure  With context: HAHA! Oh man. Smacked that shit down!
Well it certainly gave me pisces.
oh do you work/ study there? its a nice place. been there. quaint little town. well, im sure some people are scattered, but at least there'd be a UK/ Southeast network up and running. 
Outside of /r/politics, not a lot of people want Western European Socialism in the United States lol.  That seems to be the path that Obama is leading us towards.
I assume it was stolen and he was trying to get rid of it because the cops were after him? That, or he was trying to kidnap you.
Haha, sorry. I felt my message was getting too serious so I decided to be utterly silly. No offense intended.
1 regular key and death prophet Sash of Death’s Bride ?
I just don't get it...
It works on any Ayatollah!
Amare (ah-mahr-ay). It means, "be loved". 
Me! There's a NaNoWriMo group that (well, 2 years ago) met at Borders. That was before it closed down. I have no idea where they meet up now, but it is geared towards older people and not students.  This year, I'm actually going to do a new idea! Every year since I was 14, I do the same general concept, but write it in different viewpoints and settings, maybe change around the characters. I seriously have 7 versions of the same story (6 from NaNoWriMo, 1 from Young Authors). This year, I'm going for a legit, publishable YA novel. Too bad it's based off of a dream from 6 years ago and now it just sounds like Hunger Games and Divergent had a child and this is the product.
No, this turtle's a dick [NSFW].....http://farm7.staticflickr.com/6149/6009639715_50eef6ed9c_z.jpg
Yeah... I agree. That's why it's on the list.
I can't wait for Rush's conspiracy theory that Obama had the hurricane artificially generated so he could respond only for political gain.  Think about it.  It's actually less crazy than some of the shit that man says.  
Guma's been awful lonely since Harold passed away.
Lindland wrestled in the olympics, yet no one would say he has a chance vs jones, even in his prime. Wrestling by itself won't be that effective vs jones, and jones will outstrike him unless jones gets caught.
Your opinion is all well and good, but your initial reply is still no less baffling, haha.  There are actually NPC conversations between American soldiers in Spec Ops: The Line. One I remember very vividly when two Americans were talking about how beautiful post-sandstorm Dubai was, and how they knew they were "doing the right thing" by being there. There are many moments like that you might have missed if you haven't thoroughly played through the entire game. What Spec Ops does is, in my book, far more humanizing than anything Warfighter does, especially when viewed as a sum of its parts.
We're not Jr. though. We were a school before they were a state and receiving funding as USC before the school was even planned.
If a fully grown person were frozen, they would be dead. 
You'd *think* so, wouldn't you? Yet somehow everyone's pet bug or feature wish is always Priority: Highest / Severity: Critical.
Very good to know. Thanks!
Yea it's possible, you just need to remember to stay quiet. Listen to music in headphones
For those that are prepared to lecture, we haven't set it out yet. Rest easy!  My other two ideas for a Trick or Treat bowl were: 1. Put out a bowl of sugar and a scoop, with a sign above that reads "Cut out the middle-man." and 2. Tie my dog outside with a sign, "Pet my dog. Happy Halloween."
Poor Fenixbro.  You really did give your life for Aiur.
The paperclip things I eventually decided against. You CAN do it to say which pages you do/don't want included, but with this method the book is cut up down the middle and glued so you lose some margin. Instead, with the method I used, you can get each comic individually sewn down the line where the ~~paperclip~~**staples** would be which means that there is no loss of margin compared to with your standard comic.  Obviously, with a cutting-each-page-out method, you couldn't remove an ad if there was story on the other side (which is usually the case). With this method, there are 4 pages which need to be content-free for it to be removable - two on either side of the center of the book - so it's really not worth it.  The initial plan with the paperclips was to remove promotional stories at the back of books or sections which I was considering including in other binds etc. but I'm glad I chose against it.  That's the reason I eventually went for this instead of for the other method - I didn't want to lose a vital handful of millimeters in the middle of pages (they couldn't be that specific on how much would be lost and it would ruin spreads).  It seems pretty sturdy to me, but I'm being very wary as of yet and haven't given them a proper read through.  The pages seem to lie perfectly when the book is open so far (although like I say I haven't gone through them all yet).
Yes
Yes sir, lvl 50 sublime volcano
This. If you don't mind the pre-2008 look, I'm sure you could find one for around 2500 or under.  Just a couple options http://sandiego.craigslist.org/csd/mcy/3344145695.html http://sandiego.craigslist.org/csd/mcy/3375726029.html
Statistics generated from CompulsivelyCalm's posting history:  * Your active hours (in UTC): Chart [#1](http://i.imgur.com/85N4b.png), [#2](http://i.imgur.com/7H5wt.png). * Your subreddits ([chart](http://i.imgur.com/Gm6Jn.png)):  |Subreddit|Submissions|Comments| |:-|:-|:-| /r/AskReddit|6|523| /r/rpg|8|79| /r/atheism|1|63| /r/funny|0|39| /r/techsupport|2|33| /r/gaming|5|23| /r/news|0|18| /r/politics|1|16| /r/todayilearned|1|15| /r/WTF|0|15|   Requests can be made at /r/CHART_BOT
What do you want me to say about it?
Then wouldn't he think they're all young?
Just making a comment that I thought was clever. No need to be a dick about it.
Are you using the "Preview" version or have you updated to the latest (RTM) version? I don't have any lags with drawing on it. A good way to check is, when you start OneNote, on the splash image it should just say "OneNote" **not** "OneNote 2013 Preview".
I'll be there for a bit. =D
The "Sorry for my stupid question, I'm trying to learn!" comes off as overly patronizing... You'd be labelled 'dick' in my head until proven otherwise.  I wouldn't dance around the question.. just "Dude, what's with the long CSS declarations?  I don't get it?" ... 
Faeries vs. Treefolk would be amazing. Alt. art Oona and Doran? Yes, please.
i'm hitler, not the nun.
Im playing for Chubs.. I called it
maybe if you gave a shit you'd start doing things to be able to earn more.   while this is a funny thing to say and hear its a bad way to live and does no good for anyone
Agreed. I wish porn were more... i dunno, artistic?  All i ever see anymore is "hi there what's your name? ok and how old are you? perfect"  All of a sudden, hardcore anal sex with either no music and awful moaning, or terrible music and even worse comments by boths parties. ex: Oh you like that? Yea baby fuck my pussy, i'm your dirty whore!  Porn is just stupid today. I'm still going to watch it, but i wish it were classier. This video was sexy as hell. Nothing sexy about instant hardcore sex with no suspense.   ...   ok well that was my porn rant, enjoy. 
When she said "I do" lol
I was joking. You guys take jokes to seriously. Is Foofie so paranoid to put a bounty on my head? I THOUGHT WE HAD SOMETHING FOOFIE!
Hey buddy, relax. 
Close enough
Bandalo has a cutie mark in gift giving.
oh god, I remember this old video. haha
who is louie? how do you know the OP's name is louie? is this another karmaconspiracy?
The fact is, Christie's response to Sandy is going to be a *huge* positive during his campaign in 2016. If he soiled his response to the disaster with attacks against Obama or played a political pro-Romney game here, he'd be dirtying up what's going to be a huge selling point for him as President.  I'm very happy with his and Obama's response to the disaster, and I don't think they're *faking* their praise for one another, but this is most definitely a political move on Christie's part. (It's a rare political move that's actually good for the country, though, and not just the candidate.)
I don't feel bad for people that die in hurricanes unless they are rescue workers. I live in tornado alley, we get fucking seconds before a tornado hits.. These people had a week to leave the city.
Okay, thank you. I think I'll buy it online and pick it up then, good to know.
&gt;1: I already have a perfectly functional set of pants and jacket, I don't want to have to pay another $600 to buy a new set. 2: I commute on a motorcycle, and it's my primary form of transport. I don't want to have to wear a specific pair of pants every time I get on the bike.  While I respect that these are inconvenient things, you do realise these are incredibly trivial reasons for opposing a law, right?  &gt;then keep yourself and your car the FUCK away from me!  Hmm you didn't read it very well, I said the bike hit me hypothetically, I didn't hit them. and I realise that I'd probably see the bike, but I don't think them wearing a hi-vis jacket is going to make it any MORE likely to cause an accident.   Personally I'd like to see some testing to see whether it reduces roadside fatal accidents from motorcycles. If it does at all, it seems like a law worth pursuing, even if you have to buy a jacket to continue riding.
Thank you for making me laugh out loud. 
This article is about being arrested on charges. Let me know when a *conviction* actually alters the common law situation.
Keep reading. My argument follows that part of my post. If you disagree with it, then I welcome discussing it with you. But I can't discuss it with you until you read it, and you clearly haven't if you have to ask me why I think option C isn't racist, since it's in the body of my post.
They'd better investigate. Im pretty sure this kind of display could (and should) be classified as treason.
This offends me, the text it too jagged.
[Synchronicity](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Synchronicity)
i had to watch the heyayaya video as soon as i seen this.
Holy crap. You should also post this in r/gameofthrones if you haven't already.  BTW I'm supremely jealous right now... 
As an expert in teeth falling out dreams you have them because you're unhappy with your teeth situation. Get them fixed.
power runningback. or a line backer. the rucking in rugby can be a glorified tackle, if you get the guy in the right position
DAE hate when people stare at their mouths when they talk?
Oh look, another BRZ/FRS. How original.
RVP and Noble are both the main penalty takers.  So is Hazard, so I personally won't be selling him unless they rest him or he's injured.
You know what? You can look at any example you want of what people say happened in their relationship, or their friend's relationship, or their aunt's relationship... But every relationship is different. He could be telling the truth, and he could've changed. People change ALL THE TIME. Sometimes for the worse, sometimes for the better.  The only thing you can use to decide this is whether you believe it's worth it to find out if he'll stay true to his word and true to his change. Is it worth it to you, weighing in the risk that he might cheat on you again, and he might break your heart?   If it is and you decide to get back with him... Don't hand out all your trust TOO easily, but you do have to give him some sort of trust for the relationship to work. Work on your self confidence and independence, so that no matter what happens, you will be happy.  If it's not worth it to you to possibly have your heart/trust broken again and maybe waste time on this man (which is very well a possibility in EVERY relationship), then don't bother.
now THAT is a moustache
Sounds good.  On a related note, what (if anything) is going on with the overworld 0,0? It seems like the owner hasn't been active recently. Is it still in development?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fTznEIZRkLg
I chose my username because I had no idea what to put. I'm not a very creative person.
Private companies, I think. Bill Gates helped to launch the Iridium network a couple of decades ago (it failed). But there are thousands of satellites up there, mostly for telecomm companies like Hughes, TRW, AT&amp;T, etc.
Hey, do you have the time?
Thanks :)
I'm gonna have to say  Left Guy: 2/10, didn't even have black slacks and a black hat... what are you doing?  Middle Guy: 3/10, **HELLO! ASH IS FUCKING 10 ALL THE TIME! NO TIME FOR SCRUFFINESS!** But nice hat and old gloves with fingers cut off.  Right Girl: 5/10, added point for pokeball in right hand and added 2 more for having to deal with these two * hooligans*  [All In All...](http://i2.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/254/517/a70.gif)
haha typical Angrave
BOOBS OF WAR
I guess I cant be honest then
Her leg has a tail, First of all. Secondly talk to her! The one thing that makes rejection awesome is when you aren't...
6 feet and still growing.  Men in my family are notorious for growing well into their 30's ;)
What's wrong with that? Seriously I wouldn't know not to say that, it sounds like it answers the question.
I think i'm addicted, guess I'll stop using it though
Sorry, I wasn't saying that baby oil is more expensive than olive, but that baby oil is just marked up mineral oil. Mineral oil has essentially no benefits for your skin whatsoever and is quite comedogenic.  Olive is more expensive, but ideal in terms of skin benefits. If you don't want to spend so much, soybean (labeled vegetable oil) or even canola would be preferable to mineral oil.
"humans are awesome" --- a video of humans doing stupid shit.  Oh how we've become so adept at overcoming natural selection
Walk around with a quarter and a hammer. You're a quarter pounder. 
You are most welcome. Let me add you and I will be in the room if you are ready.
i would make snoo snoo
[PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/m59E) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/m59E/by_merchant/) / [Benchmarks](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/m59E/benchmarks/)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [Intel Core i5-3570 3.4GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80637i53570) | $212.78 @ NCIX US  **Motherboard** | [Gigabyte GA-H77-DS3H ATX  LGA1155 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gigabyte-motherboard-gah77ds3h) | $95.23 @ NCIX US  **Memory** | [Corsair XMS3 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/corsair-memory-cmx8gx3m2b1600c9) | $37.99 @ Newegg  **Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 2TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st2000dm001) | $88.99 @ Amazon  **Storage** | [Samsung 830 Series 128GB 2.5" Solid State Disk](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/samsung-internal-hard-drive-mz7pc128bww) | $87.99 @ B&amp;H  **Video Card** | [Gigabyte Radeon HD 7950 3GB Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gigabyte-video-card-gvr795wf33gd) | $287.55 @ Newegg  **Case** | [Fractal Design Arc Midi Tower ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/fractal-design-case-fdcaarcbl) | $69.99 @ Amazon  **Power Supply** | [Antec Basiq Plus 550W 80 PLUS Certified ATX12V Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/antec-power-supply-bp550plus) | $54.99 @ Newegg  **Optical Drive** | [Lite-On iHAS124-04 DVD/CD Writer](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/lite-on-optical-drive-ihas124-04) | $15.99 @ Newegg   | | **Total**  | Prices include shipping, taxes, and discounts when available. | $951.50  This is something if you don't plan on overclocking. I went with the H77 which means you can't do crossfire/SLI, but you could keep the Z77 if that's something you might want to do in the future. The 7950 should hold up for a long time though.
That or 'domestic terrorists'
They usually change in response to judgment from others. This is a good thing.
CAKE CAKE CAKE CAKE CAKE   I hate that song..
 Would love to see a picture of this guy - I keep seeing the minister bad-guy-ghost-dude from Poltergeist 2 in my head, when trying to picture him.  Think it would be possible to snap a pic of him?
Reminds me of that insult put here a few weeks ago. "You can be in a barrel full of tits and still come out sucking your own thumb."
&gt;/r/worldnews  Of fucking course. Lhitlerally neo-nazis.
that suuuuuucks! Aint no time to waste on bitches like that. You made the right call.
Cute Doctor! 
Ooops, yeah. That's right, but what about the other thing I wrote directly after that?
Edit: spelling.  Won't Who is Except
I forgot the /s ... sorry.  It was a joke.
* NA - http://forums.riftgame.com/rift-general-discussions/guild-recruitment/ * EU Defiant - http://forums.riftgame.com/shard-forums/eu-shards/shard-travel-hub-defiant/ * EU Guardian - http://forums.riftgame.com/shard-forums/eu-shards/shard-travel-hub-guardian/
My mother and father had split up and he was living with this other woman. I went to spend the weekend there and in the morning we all cuddled in the bed. The other woman put me on the outside of her and her kids in the middle of her and my father.   Her daughter also told me I should go die because I was worthless and didn't have a Daddy anymore. My Daddy was HER Daddy now. We were about 5 or 6. 
Never heard of the word "troll" before huh?
You should, it's interesting to say the least.
I've done it a few times, once with 80x, a few others (probably about 4 or 5) with only 10x. I find the 10x to be really quite enjoyable. A total change in perspective, really different than the other psychedelics out there, and only lasts a little while, so you know even if it's super intense you'll be done soon. I also really like how laughy it gets. Maybe I'll try some stronger ones again sometime, but for me I find the 10x is a good level of head change without your head exploding and shooting into another crazy world.
Well, if Detroit were in Hondouras its murder rate would be well below the national average. So, I'm hesitant to agree that we should ignore the context. Those cities that I listed also went through their crisises in the seventies but have since recovered and have been growing... unlike Detroit (some neighborhoods &amp; distant suburbs excepted). Also, I was trying to better understand what factors someone pointing at Coleman Young as the answer would cite. As for my characterization of sprawl: I mean that people who wake up, commute for hours per day in their car, live in fenced off suburbs, and return home to their television must have less chance to speak to others, despite being surrounded by dehumanizing traffic that has a good chance of harming them (by accident and by its nature via cardiovascular disease). 
How old was your neighbor?  And hotwheels track?! Noo!
I actually watched it a few days ago. I remembered how awsome it was.
I was speaking of all DPS characters as being disposable/interchangeable, though I agree that the glass cannons do the best DPS when played properly. I have raided as tank, healer, and DPS, and I can say without a shadow of a doubt that a DPS, at least a ranged DPS, requires the least preparation.  Additionally, DPS characters dropping out of raids usually affect the raid makeup the least.  There are far more adverse possibilities that could occur if a tank or healer switches out, rather than a DPS.  I needed to drop my responsibility, (I was a class officer before, as well), so that if my RL time commitments required me elsewhere, my new role would have the least negative impact on the guild's raid.  Speaking of which, I was in an AWESOME guild back then, &lt;CEB&gt; on Bronzebeard 2006-2008, and at least 50% of the main 40 man raid became RL friends.  I still talk to a decent amount of those people today, outside of WoW.  Also interesting, about 20% of our raiders, myself included, were prior or current military.  Great people, great times!
Well World of Warcraft is harder to balance due to it being both a pve and pvp game. I am sure if they dropped one or the other they could balance it in a heart beat.
I rode all through winter last year. There were only 3 days I didn't get to ride, and then only because there was snow on the ground. Not just a little snow either, a lot of snow. I live in the mountains of Reno Nevada. Coldest I ever rode in was 9 degrees Fahrenheit, or -12.8 Celsius. 
Portland, Oregon.
When you `git bisect`, it will show you a smaller commit as the cause of the regression.  You can also revert them more easily.
spam.
catfish, throw out 4 rods put em in holder, clip bells to them and crack open a beer with your buddies and wait for your rods to start playing christmas music.Bass fishing is okay, its just not that challenging to me. I can get one almost every other cast, its just a pain in the ass to throw back 5-10 lil ones before landing a decent sized one. Catfishing, the little ones are 10lb and smaller.
Use most wanted car - Win all races - win next car - repeat
Lets go Dig!~
I had no idea that I spend so much time in so few subreddits. Hm.
That they will somehow twist the lore, so that current dead characters are suddenly brought back to life for no appearant or logical reason
I have some left but my giveaways are gone.  The remainders are for trades
Wikipedia says 25% infection chance through childbirth... that's so, so sad.
C's initial\* inability to express "`x` is not aliased by anything else" is a good example of one of the few abstraction costs that conversion from C to machine code does incur.  Fortran TTBOMK doesn't allow you to express the opposite.  So you get faster code in the (common) case where this assumption holds, but certain logic (e.g. `memmove()`) that could be expressed in machine code can't be expressed at all.  There are other examples of abstraction penalties in C.  E.g. the x86 instruction set computes division and remainder at the same time, so if your code applies both to the same variable, whether this instruction is called once or twice is up to the optimiser.  It could miss the opportunity.  \* Modern versions of C have `restrict`, which does allow this.
I'm just loling over here, after making a valid argument you really have nothing to support your viewpoint.  Good luck finding a husband when you think every man in the world wants to sexually assault you.
Ha! That's a real knee-slapper! 
Muscles Glasses from Epic Meal Time is going to be doing an AMA on /r/InternetAMA on November 3rd at 12PM EST if you're interested.
[in video form](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Kvm1Yxk-L08)
No, in Britain, several popular newspapers traditionally feature a topless woman on [Page 3](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Page_Three). Its less popular now than it was, but it still happens in The Sun... 
Happy birthday.  [This](http://www.money.co.uk/article/1004510-is-debit-card-protection-the-same-as-for-credit-cards.htm) seems to indicate that you're right.  But it also points out that there is, at least, some level of protection.
the fact that it's an older successful (white) looking man makes this even better
I use the 'missing' set of the symbol grids for 1-9, and the empty space in the third grid for 0.  * Equal length lines, no dots: A-I * Different lengths, no dots: J-R * Different lengths, dots: S-Z or S-0 * Equal length lines, dots: 1-9  *{Edited for formatting}*
how so? What do you want pics wise?
CIRCLEJERK IS EVERYWHERE  WE ARE [LE]GION
We don't know the meaning of despair! Just who the hell do you think we are?
Yeah I know, It's just... I don't know. I feel like Anthony would understand why I felt weird with him legitimately mentioning it eight times. He made totally great points though, he gets the kind of drunk that I get.  It was also fun listen to Anthony's responses to his drunkenness, after finding out Anthony is a non-drinker. That's probably one of the best streams they've done, which I feel kind of shitty for saying because it's 80% Drunk Grant (19% witty responses from the collective, 1% Helicopter/Aeroplane Uli transformer jokes).  Drunk Grant setting up Blavis, with on-form Brad Nicholson support, plus Ash and the odd smart videogame discussion from Anthony would be my perfect stream. Sorry Uli/Aaron!
You gotta smack some serious ass for that to happen.  Keep your pimp hand strong. 
I've begun aiming for a [2] and keeping at that level to keep a productive and creative buzz. I can't cook at a [4] as I have no ability to multitask, started grating cheese one night and burnt a lb of beef.  Last Friday I got in late ~11pm and thought I'll hit a [5] and get some work done. Used the vape not the bong and started pushing for that mythical [11]. That was a big oops. Felt like my launch craft got turned around and aimed for the couch seat, felt like I was under 5gs the entire time.
Also have the [transcript](http://www.scribd.com/doc/111736791) available if there is interest.  EDIT: added transcript.  If you perform it, record it!  I'd love to see it performed live!
Mine is USMC as well:) Semper fi:)
BOB DOLE  Bob Dole  bob dole  ^bob ^dole
I've noticed.  The AC needs to deal with these concerns over women's issues, and dealing with them makes the AC more credible than other organizations that are likely to sweep such things under the rug or ignore them.
She is creepy, evil, and twisted, but I enjoy her screen time. She's really smart and cunning, but I have a feeling she'll get over her head if she teams up with Gyp.   The scene where she was bathing the Jimmy-lookalike was seriously unsettling, and I never get that type of emotion from a TV show. 
Maybe if Atlanta locks down a playoff spot, they will rely on the run to finish the regular season.
The horror...the horror. 
I love you too man
Damn, I'm looking good. 
"Hey, I'm [redstar55]. What's your name?" Honestly this will work more often than any pick up line.
fair enough :)
Haha, oh wow this is awesome!
I've had it with these motherfucking Uruk-hai on this motherfucking plane!
I would bump up the PSU to a 500 watt, just for the headroom and the fact that Nvidia recommends a 450 watt (it's more or less if something goes wrong with the PSU, that you will be able to say that you have one that meets the minium recommended specs). Other then that everything looks good  You could save money by dropping down to 8GB of ram, and dropping down to a i5-3570k, you won't see any difference in gaming.
Yeah, it basically changes the procedure to exploring a bit then deciding to make a new world if you don't like it instead of exploring until you find a good place.
Or you just happen to be needing that thing... because Google knows what you want.
&gt;Don't ask to leave the room even if it's a small discussion class. Just leave  This *might* not apply is in labs (like chem labs). We needed to let the TA know we were stepping out for a moment in Gen Chem, though I don't think the TAs for the higher classes ever cared. Maybe my TA was just weird. Although I guess it still wasn't asking, it was more telling. But still.
I had Black Ops for both PC and console.  PC pissed me off to no end. Lots of bullshit. Servers kicking/banning people for using the AUG or Famas because they're supposedly OP. And don't get me started on "crouch-only servers".  Yeah, I know, "Why don't you just join a server that doesn't do those things?" BECAUSE ALL THE GOOD SERVERS ARE EITHER FULL OR HAVE TOO HIGH A PING!  Oh, and at this late date, there are vastly more people who are still playing Black Ops 1 on console than there are on PC.  So, yes, I agree that FPS games in general are better on PC than console, but I heartily recommend playing CoD on console if you have a choice.
Better make the most of it...
I don't care what people say about this album.  I've been listening to Rise Against since Revolutions Per Minute was out and Appeal to Reason is by far my favorite album. It's not that the newer albums "suck" it's just that bands change their sound and people are afraid of change or have some type of emotional attachment to a particular album and prefer THAT sound. 
Too bad there's Lakers fans everywhere to downvote it. 
Typical :/
Well drawn but I just hate what it symbolizes.
Political science is not really a major that gives you a lot of career options, and unfortunately, unemployment is fairly high for recent graduates right now.  What kinds of jobs are you applying for, and what are your skills?  Work experience?   If you post your resume over in /r/resumes you can get some help there. 
nope, its still a .gif.   On imgur you can just throw ".jpg" and it will still transfer as a gif.
Biblical history and historical evidence. As you said spirituallity is and ungraspable force therefore meanigless without understanding. How is a person spiritual? Yes, you can leave it as an ungraspable force, by why impose that will upon others?
Your character is still there.  Locked in the prison cell, alone, terrified.  Door barricaded.  Huddled and weeping.  Because you are too much of a wuss to go rescue him and get him out.  
How predictable 
I hate you. 
Ah, genocide, it's okay if we're doing it.
There are two options here, write a simple brute force program and take 2 years to decrypt the nonsense, or spend 2 years to come up with a very fast algorithm to decrypt the nonsense.
Marbles aren't magnetically attracted to one another.  The problem is when kids eat multiple powerful magnets, they end up sticking to one another, possibly pinching stomach or intestinal tissue in-between them. Tissue hypoxia occurs and the tissue perforation follows. Hole in stomach or intestine = stomach acids, digestive juices, hordes of GI bacteria leaking into your body cavities --&gt; NOT GOOD!  [Some case studies of kids eating magnets](http://www.cdc.gov/mmwr/preview/mmwrhtml/mm5548a3.htm)  The problem isn't the product itself, but when irresponsible or uneducated (more likely) parents allow their kids to get a hold of them.
Because they were not careful with the blanks, they were sloppy with checking the weapon before they fired.
Me (Zypher106), Betasir19 and hamletface to be exact
Uhm... Do you live in Wv?
&gt;Must be self motivated and have a clean driving record. the implication is that driving is in the job description
Obligatory [stop using W3Schools](http://www.w3fools.com).
No idea
Pretty normal.
Choke/Lightning abuse was so fucking lame.
Stanley is better
Yea. I remember that. He gets mad if it's rehosted on imgur. I made sure to use his website's version of the hosted image, since linking to the page wouldn't be compatible with RES.  and that way he still gets the traffic :)
[Higher-resolution version](http://phantastick.files.wordpress.com/2011/09/w12.jpg) (2200 x 650, 361 kB) 832%  *BLUNT_FORCE_HONESTY (OP) may directly remove this comment by clicking [here](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=QualityEnforcer&amp;message=This+request+can+only+be+sent+by+BLUNT_FORCE_HONESTY+and+it+may+take+up+to+5+minutes+for+the+comment+to+be+deleted.+Thanks+for+reporting%2C+and+sorry+for+the+inconvenience%2C+%3A-C.&amp;subject=R-t3_12fh23).*
pictures provided by [this](http://www.scalfcollectibles.com/Photos/Resin_Bellows_camera_w_flash_med.jpg)  seriously though they look great, and i can't wait to see the strawberry cough all grown up.
I do believe six million lice and fleas died in those gas chambers, but I am quite sure people would not fit. 
Wait, what?
How about a mode where you only play the first part of Diretide? The final Roshan stage gets repetitive if you're not going for the record.
I'm drunk...And I can tell.... By the way... Have a seat over here...
Best day ever. Free public trampoline.
Always trust your gut instinct. If you even have to ask the question, dont buy it. That is unless it is an amount of money you wont be upset about losing.
Thank you!
Someone else knows about the sock bun? I had never, ever heard of this until I was at work (restaurant) and heard that pretty much every girl there was keeping a sock in her hair. My momma raised a fool. 
You gotta spit it man! You're deff holding back, I used to be the same way, didn't like my voice, but rapping is like dancing if you go all out you seem way better than if you hold back and half ass it. You got potential tho, stick with it
Game Marriage is the best, been a fan since episode one.  I wish I had some buddies to play on the PS3 version like you guys.  I've played 10 matches online so far and **EVERY SINGLE ONE OF THEM** someone just spams running moves the entire match.  So annoying.  Why is the community so shit for these games?
Note the end of the url; 4352**-**jpg. If it actually was a picture, it'd say 4352**.**jpg, so a dot instead of a dash. This is for all file extensions as they're called, e.g. .png, .gif, .jpeg. Therefore I wouldn't have clicked on the link at all, as it isn't a direct link to an image so can be harmful.  Just as a heads up for people who may not know/notice the replacement, not meant to sound condescending.
It's not so much about the aggravation -its the shifts in body language that involuntarily occur in most people when they're uncomfortable with a subject. The strangest time has been when I realized that the majority of girls in a college class of mine had an abortion. 
Real time enterprise systems. Don't ask which Uni lol!
then you may have a hearing problem.
SAF did a very big mistake here...
i honestly don't think this is harder than mannslaughter (expert mission on mannworks). my friends and i beat this twice without too much effort, and the nearly identical group has struggled mightily at times on mannslaughter.
Still in high school...the hat terror continues haha.  Oh man, fuck trying to look for your own hat, especially when everyone dumps them in a pile for some reason. I put a badge on mine for easy recognition. Did you guys all have the same schoolbags as well? The ones owned by fucking every school ever?
We're 13th in total D and 12th in scoring D. Our defense is fine and doesn't have one specific glaring hole that we could fill with one player. 
actually i though you were talking about rings that focus on attributes to maximize character dps, then i looked at your profile and got what you wanted to say. so no, i really didnt
PICs or or it didn't happen.
http://i.minus.com/ib29zeIE0CoJfz.gif 
Don't click the link just to complain about me
Upvote for you sir. Hadn't been able to find that video thanks.
Who gives a shit about your theater, we're talking about the crowd. And you know what? Neither Cesaro nor Gabriel have anything for the general fan to care about. No character, no story, no motivation to boo or cheer. Neither of them are over in the least, and Cesaro's past shouldn't be a talking point. 
Yes, we just take creepy pictures of them and post them on the internet instead. 
They really do, for a while he didn't realise his own size and was still playing as if he were a 10 week old pup! Thank you :)
yes
Alright. Maybe I'll talk to my mom this weekend or something. It's been bugging me for the last couple days and sometimes the feeling status for a whole before I can relax. Once a week would probably be the most often I'd want to go. I'm not sure if I really need to go that much though.
This is Virginia Tech! in McBryde Auditorium
well, colour me corrected! thanks for the info
Thank you miss_trixie, you're right. He finally texted me saying that he would be rushing to get his daughter ready for Halloween and I probably should hold off on coming over... WTF?!?!?! You think??? I haven't heard from you for three days and that's all you write me at 4:45 pm?! 
Ah :) That's ok. I mean, to be honest it can be difficult for the OP to get recognition. Thanks for showing up.
I had a piss poor time with this today. I had the 4.2 camera installed and tried updating to today's CM10 nightly. The result? Bootloops. Bootloops everywhere.  I've finally got it working again, and I really like having it, so I'm just not updating again until some real 4.2 ROMs come out.
Things like this are ridiculous. The system should have obviously been designed better.  Go to a place like Japan and get off a station too late, go to the fare adjustment machine, pay the extra and you're on your way. No fine because you made a simple mistake.
Just downloaded it, thanks... and I'd like to thank Codeweavers also, for making it available in .rpm format.
How is it not his own fault that he glued his hand to his crotch?
Shoes on the couch??? Were you raised in a- oh never mind!
My fiancée and I thankfully had the foresight to talk about how to announce and who to tell in that order (plus he's not big into facebook), but if my family found out from facebook, I wouldn't have been happy... mostly because they wouldn't have been happy. 
Pretty sure they nerfed the drops now though -- the items in my last two diretides were rather common. 
A childhood friend of mine was in a car accident where the car went head on into a tree at 45 mph and he was the only survivor. He ran 6 miles back home and didn't remember what happened. Being in shock is a crazy thing. You have no control over what is going on and no concept of reality.
Unbelievable man... How long to do this? 
I KNOW WHAT PUTA MEANS!
but this would totally ruin the game because it makes crafting too easy then people will have to say "i got 99 crafting BEFORE make all' and feel all smug about it while everyone else is a casual pleb  herp derp
Is he getting over 63 million?
Aimpoint showed up today.  Should hopefully be able to pickup the upper tomorrow and then I'm just waiting on LaRue to make more handstops and mail them to me.  http://i.imgur.com/we8hMh.jpg
All a change in pressure does is change the rate of flow.  I'm not sure about this device but with lever espresso machines, the flow can be observed and pressure regulated to achieve the desired flow.  Adjustments can make the shot last as longer or shorter as desired.  Lack of "consistency" is not necessarily an issue.
Beautiful OOP
wow looks delicious 
Yes, that one... haha. In a Brisbane hotel room.
FALSE. his body was burned.
Really cute.  But ... keep a close eye on him/her.  People do awful things to cats, especially black ones, on Halloween.  (People suck, animals don't.)
You're able to add and remove applications at will. Preinstalled apps are all uninstallable (aside from Desktop, of course). I don't really see how this is an issue of pushing software and stifling competition. You can remove and customize the start screen at will. What would you prefer? Absolutely no preinstalled software on the computer? Because that's what it seems would make you happy based on the concerns you listed here.
No no, try the doorbell
Yeah, well that's just it -- it's okay for me cos I could go to Canada or England or New Zealand but Americans are kind of limited. It really sucks, because they tell you it's a good thing to do, but really, it's not. 
I have a wex
Certes, aren't you being a bit puerile?  ^^^^^^^I ^^^^^^^really ^^^^^^^hope ^^^^^^^I'm ^^^^^^^sans ^^^^^^^peur ^^^^^^^et ^^^^^^^sans ^^^^^^^reproche.  By the way, you should call me soon, perchance?
When an Eagles fan calls out your bad behavior, you know you've crossed the line.
My statement was purely hypothetical. I've never actually talked to anybody who would do that, but I was only trying to point out that it depends completely on the person whether it would seem cute or not.   Of course, I'd also prefer a normal conversation over someone forcibly trying to be cute, but those statements just seemed so one-sided that it made me want to prove them wrong. And no, I didn't see your reply as feminist, most normal people would probably share your opinion.
&gt; Java is really not efficient and not really used for real games  not really, jvm is way better then mono, MS .net runtime is comparable to jvm, better in some cases. Java has no big names driving game dev on it as a platform so no one uses it.
Hello there, NLO fan.
Didn't read link... Couldn't get away fast enough...
In the actual episode, the line was even weirder. Zordon requests "five overbearing and overemotional humans," which Alpha interprets as meaning teenagers. (Yes, I have been retaining this information for like 20 years now. Finally, it comes in handy!)
It really is. The guy who took the picture actually doesn't know him, I asked, but I linked the guy in the picture to this thread via facebook and he told me the comments were hilarious. 
im at work lol
appeals for death penalty cases are, AFAIK, automatic, and a pretty large number of those convictions are either commuted or overturned on appeal
&gt;IF you farmed 3 hours a day only going low mp on an efficient route (like the alkizer one.) you WOULD be getting 100m after 3-4 days of farming.  The fuck? You expect to make 100 mil for every 9-12 hours that you play? I can easily put in 12 hours of play and not find an item worth over 2-3 million.
I would say the gh15 forums BUT - While they do know their stuff to a T, there are alot of competitors on there looking to go pro, so the average dose recommendations are a little excessive.
added
Thank you for your insight, I may just wait up and get the Create!  I owe you one GrimBrunn, one day I'll return the favor!
That's the thing though. The word attractiveness does not always mean sexually preferable. In American culture so much insane value has been placed on sex that that word attractive always means sexually preferable now. Attractive just means decent looking, like presentable, as opposed to rough or ugly looking. It isn't anything special... like being blessed with great genes. If you are simply attractive (nothing wrong with you) and are in a good market, you'll do great.  Now some men/women just exude sexual desire... they exist in every country... they're hot. Not many people are born like that, but some few are. Those people probably get what they seek usually, markets bearing.
Easy Trisom-E
where have you been?!
I prefer being a safe size as well.
I knew that book had something entertaining in it.
Yea but shhh we aren't allowed to talk about that one! I'm from Glasgow so I don't know of that strange place you call Edinburgh :)  You can still be socialist and have gone to a private school, you are still a teenager so I'm not sure I'd even be able to go against my parents wishes and say no, though probably a lot of the people around you wont share those views. 
I had zero this year again.  I had two last year, and that's the most I've had in five years.  I was over prepared as usual, so I have 4 pounds of candy all to myself now.  I don't really like sweets all that much, so if there is anywhere collecting donated candy, I'm probably going to give most of it to them (but I'm keeping the dark chocolate mounds!)
Marijuana Man
For some reason I can't stand long nails at all. Once they start to get even a bit long I just feel the need to cut them. [This](http://i.imgur.com/TBG7V.jpg) is about as long as I ever let them get. I'm not sure when this all started because when I was younger I'd let them get really long and would only cut them down when one would break. They never used to bother me.
I dont think that would work out too well!
Happens pretty frequently in my city (Memphis). We have a lot of flat pay lots and homeless people will collect parking tickets from the trash or ground and charge people to park, only to get run off by a real attendant later check the lot. The people who paid thereafter have their cars ticketed for $75 and the "attendant" is nowhere to be found.
but...his dance is delicious
N.B. He is goliath right now. But not sure what is going to happen during Marvel NOW!
fucking lucky fuck ass
Maybe he had a nude modelling conflict.
that's what tasers are for, bro. 
I agree with the previous posters. You're definitely NOT ugly, and you're still so young, you're going to fill out and grow into your looks. I also think you'd look better if you gained some weight. :) 16 is a good age to start working out, just don't overdo it.
Yes yes  Chick tracts are terrible, stupid, poorly made, racist, bigoted, wrong about everything, delusional, conspiratorial, and way too easy to make fun of.  Back Of the line!
[No reason...](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fQ56ho5gZxE)
Here is dailykos/salon/huffpo aka reddit front page if he had done that:  "Out of touch Romney thinks writing a check will solve all hurricane problems"  "Shady Romney cant think of anything other than money to help helpless hurricane victims"  just take a step back and see whats going. Damned if does, damned if he doesnt.
"Motherfucker better have insurance"
To End All Wars has a lot of Scots. Ignore the gentlemen on the cover, since they are just supporting actors. Its all about Ernest Gordon from a Scottish regiment.
I left my reddit logged in a work, fucking Huskies.
Also note that this article does not have a single citation for any claims made. It speaks of dliuent as a toxic, volatile component when in actual it is no more toxic or volatile than the gasoline you put in your vehicle. I would listen to what they have to say but be skeptical when you see slant like this. Any time you see "tar sands", that is a term coined by NGOs opposed to the oil sands.  If you are struggling to find legitimate studies on these issues I would suggest google with the institute name and dilbit ie; "batelle dilbit corrosion"  If you still have trouble let me know and I will direct link you the studies.  These responses are all on my iphone excuse spelling and or grammar please :)
4.9 rating on Ratemyprofessors.com, with 44 ratings. That's pretty impressive.
This is a lovely combination!
Her thighs are nice
Are you a fan of British horror/thrillers like *Eden Lake*? Would you ever direct a movie like that?
I gave like 50 rares to cdxliv's stream and we put them all in Cain's house for a giveaway haha.
You are not going insane. You are not suicidal. And you are definitely not the only person to experience this.  What you're experiencing are [intrusive thoughts](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Intrusive_thoughts) and when you don't realise what they are, they can be really disturbing. I spent many, many years terrified of what my mind was trying to do to me because every time I walked over a bridge I had to try very hard to ignore the urges to jump off it. But this is a *normal psychological quirk*, and it's extremely common.  If you are severely affected by these thoughts, to the extent that it is affecting the quality of your daily life, then do seek help. But most people have these thoughts and get over them quite quickly, so please don't be worried that there's something wrong with you.
Muscles Glasses from Epic Meal Time is going to be doing an AMA on /r/InternetAMA on November 3rd at 12PM EST if you're interested.
Streetlamp Le Moose knows it all
I just sent out this mass text, maybe our paths will cross! "It's Fun To Do Bad Things Halloween Not-Bar Crawl 2012! It goes like this: We throw on some costumes, get a dirty thirty of Keystones, a couple of bottles of liquor and wander the streets (Fry &amp; the square) doin' hoodrat stuff. Occasionally we pop into bars to use the bathroom, make a scene and let the ballers amongst us buy some shots. When we get tired we camp out on the square or Lou's parking lot and throw rocks at cars. I promise it'll be cheap 'cause everybody's broke due to rent time. First 30-pack and two bottles of liquor are on me. So tonight, unwad your panties, quit being a little bitch and throw on a costume so we can get shitty and wander the mean streets of Denton doing' bad things. Starts around 10:30? Ends with your arrest? Sounds good to me. If anybody needs to crash at my house and doesn't suck that can be arranged."  I'll be a very drunk big bird, Halloween reddit animals unite!
[](/twibeam) LUCKY!!!!!
In fact, I am Harry Potter for halloween. Haha, how perfect!
nom nom nom
Thank you!   You'll receive credit in the Guide for doing so. 
How was the meth?
You're better than most of us 
Like /r/gape, maybe?
Roleplaying doesn't have to be about telling stories, but in my experience if you want it to be engaging over a long period of time story is a very important part of that.  However simply narrating a story and expecting the PCs to move through it on a rail will also fail to be engaging.  Which is why I wrote that the GM should adapt to the PCs decisions and ultimately be co-author with all of them.  In the future please read the entire post before you decry it, since you essentially just reiterated what I had already said.  And you might consider not stating your opinion in such a way as to make it sound as if you are stating a fact (ie. "This is terrible advice" = "I completely disagree with this advice").  At any rate thanks for your input.
I am a tall, muscular, strong person. They will send me to jail for that shit. 
His pool has a very string slow, but he needs to bait the enemy into an engagement to take advantage of it.
Fellow (female) runaway. I'm not sure why, but I always make excuses and escape after sex. I try to go to his house so I don't have to kick him out of my bed. I think it's because I don't like cuddling (it feels too intimate to me).
Not really a question but I am reading Knightfall for the first time right now, I have read Bane in comics before but the suspense of him stalking Batman and studying him is really intense, I am getting excited waiting for him to jump into the action.   Anyway thanks for the writing you do. 
http://i.imgur.com/uozKn.jpg  bad product placement....
and more povs from her would intensify the aa vs. great other exposition coming up to the end. tho i reckon jon wont leave the wall anyways...
You need to know your arrow/electron pushing AND reagents to do it well.
ಠ_ಠ
Please explain.
This is already happening, and the sheer power of the circlejerk's rotational velocity caused the Hurricane Sandy. I read this on /r/politics 
pues ya van $40,000, nada mal.  andale, ve a poner tu granito de arena.
Dump him without even saying why. In fact, say "You know why". That will fuck with his head for ages.  Also, by doing that you avoid being branded as nosey.
Wow your brightness settings are somethin' else.
He's supposed to have his chin tucked into his chest, and hands on his reserve and elbows tucked in.
That is an impeccable Snooky...
But was he even tasered? It's all very vague.
That... Thats it.
&gt;And yeah, some of this is copypasted from a disagreement I had with an MRA and a post I made in /r/communism recently so for anyone who saw both of those sorry to repeat myself.  It sounds like it because it doesn't address a single thing I said.  &gt;The bourgeois sees his wife a mere instrument of production. He hears that the instruments of production are to be exploited in common, and, naturally, can come to no other conclusion that the lot of being common to all will likewise fall to the women.  This seems like your changing the context quite severely.  I am not trying to make women into *instruments of production* any more than men.  Marx saw the species being of humanity as a productive being, as proactive productive, rather than an *instrument*.  This is the crux of the meaning of the quote to mean (a Kantian), it sounds like the problem here is reducing women to an *instrument* of production, rather than seeing them as productive beings in their essence.   &gt;Anybody who knows anything of history knows that great social changes are impossible without the feminine ferment. Social progress can be measured exactly by the social position of the fair sex (the ugly ones included).  And?  This quote could easily be read to say that Marx believed that women need to join the workers movement, that without their aid the workers movement is futile.  Furthermore, he could be read as saying here that the further along we make progress to a Communist society, the better standing women will be automatically.  Or, to see this in the reverse, do you think Marx would say that social progress could be measured in a bourgeois society that treats women well?  I suppose that's progress over a bourgeious society that treats women poorly, but no one would say that Marx's goal was only to increase the standing of women in society, but rather, as I read it, he's suggesting that women's standing in society is a means to an end, as "social changes are impossible without the feminine ferment." He *needs* them to bring about the changes he wants.  &gt;The modern individual family is founded on the open or concealed domestic slavery of the wife, and modern society is a mass composed of these individual families as its molecules. In the great majority of cases today, at least in the possessing classes, the husband is obliged to earn a living and support his family, and that in itself gives him a position of supremacy, without any need for special legal titles and privileges. Within the family he is the bourgeois and the wife represents the proletariat.  And this has nothing to do with what I'm talking about.  But since you brought it up, how is Engles discussing women's domestic rights in terms of class struggle not an indication of how they saw sexism and racism as symptoms or manifestations of the larger bourgeois/proletariat struggle?  He literally calls them that, the man *is* the bourgeois and the women *is* the proletariat.  He may champion women's rights, but as a manifestation and extension of the larger class struggle and an end to exploited labor. It's nice you took a seminar on Marx and feminism, but I don't really see (1) how any of this is relevant to my earlier points [you said yourself it's copypasta from another thread and (2) how any of those quotes prove that Marx, Engles or any of the other thinkers thought that class struggle wasn't the primary struggle of history.  Certainly modern feminists have attempted to interpret it this way, projecting reward through history their beliefs onto Marx (somewhat ironically, since feminists despise the Other projecting their vision onto them, and yet they're happy to use show that everyone they agree with throughout history was really thinking what they think, just in disguise).  But where in Marx's writings does he endorse the progress of women's for women's sake?  Where does Engels say that gender equality is an end in itself?  Where does Lenin say that we should set aside the struggle of the working classes in order to promote women's standing in society, for the sake of women *qua* women, and not as productive beings?  As *I* said elsewhere, you can prescribe a painkiller, but you have you to address the cause.  Otherwise, you're just concealing the real problem.  If I have cancer, sure, give me a painkiller.  But if that's your priority, and you think that people who prioritize curing cancer just don't care about my pain, then I don't understand you.  Doctors can emphasize different parts of treating the patient without flipping shit, but as soon as a socialist says that he or she thinks that workers rights' issues need to be addressed at large (as an extension of women's rights), then the feminist socialist flip shit and start accusing them of sexism, racism, you name it.  Workers of the world unite, indeed.  EDIT:  Wow, double downvotes in 10 minutes.  Someone can't handle contrary opinions, huh?
And the scumbag of the year award goes to....
Sent you an invite.  I have a sub 4 second Bee.
&gt; We're fighting the good fight over at /r/keto  How rational of you.
I like how Star Wars fans are still bitching about the prequels in a thread which is making fun of them for bitching all the time. Seriously, Episode three was SEVEN years ago. That's like complaining about some terrible sex you had one night for a decade, shut the fuck up already, no one cares either way except other boring cunts like you. They're fucking MOVIES for fuck's sake. 
So is the story blaming downloading or the lack of health insurance for indie bands' hard go of it? Personally, I don't care for Cat Powers that much but this story does sort of make me feel bad for downloading music. Really, though, the whole music/movie distribution system is antiquated and broken. If downloaders are, at fault, then music labels are equally at fault for refusing to modernize and keep prices lows and music from all genres, niche and mainstream, accessible.
I'm not trying to make a point on the ethics of their usage (i think it is wrong to use such methods, especially considering the collateral damage. Simply stating that drones and unmanned vehicles may soon be the new poster childs of war, regardless of wheather we like it or not, unless of course they make it illegal to use such weapons.
[](/squintyjack) Cider, Cupcakes, and arrogance... The *Classic* triple threat.
First World Hell?
Dude he's ragging on your cord.
Doesn't work on me surprisingly, if I see a bin of mixed chocolate bars (for instance) all for a bargain price I go straight to where they usually are so I can look at all the chocolate bars when they are neat and then decide what I want (note this only applies if I was a the shop specifically for a chocolate bar, I don't just get them because they are in the box and on sale).
Mmmm, great shade of red!
&gt; I personally think we should still have paper ballots that you sign.  Not sure if that should be done. It allows people to determine who you voted for... 
Not that bad at all really. My first shave I just went for it, didn't really research the 'right way'. I wet my face, applied shaving creme and went with the grain. I cut myself, and while it was probably the worst cut I've ever received shaving, it was still painless and done bleeding within a few minutes.  The next few times were cut free and I got more confident with the blade. I've always had thick hair and I'm pretty certain my dad could kill a small animal just rubbing it back and forth on his face, so for to me say that I don't even bother cutting with the grain first now is a big deal.  As someone would always had to cut first with, then against the grain with every other blade I've ever used, with the straight razor I seem to be able to get close enough that I can just about skip a day and still have a very smooth-feeling face.
So is what he says wrong? I'm not from the uk and know nothing about their royal family so i just assumed he was right since he seems to know what he's talking about (and i cant be bothered to read up on it).
awesome, do i have to call ahead to make an appointment with an mmj doc or can i just show up?
Birdman, Dr. Dre, Diddy, all the big record execs/rappers do it. 
That's nice, enjoy your jail time.  No, you should not be able to physically assault someone because they said something you don't like.  It's wrong and it's illegal with good reason.
Nice, roof guy.  I too was once a roof guy.
&gt; We worked with mostly women  &gt; told her his balls hurt and he was going home  Sounds reasonable. He probably got stuck with a lot of extra work because of women that left the office because of their periods. Buy that man a beer.
I constantly bleach and dye my hair, so it's pretty disastrous unless I give it some olive oil love. I usually heat up about 1/4 cup's worth (sometimes adding a teaspoon of honey so it doesn't smell so weird), and rub it all up in my hair and put on a shower cap. I let it sit for an hour to overnight depending on how much time I have. My hair feels so smooth again afterwards when I shower and wash it out.  I now do it everytime I bleach. 
Here is our official fact sheet about these two. About Berani and Dumai   **Berani**  What is he? A Malayan tiger ( Panthera tigris jacksoni). Native to Penisular Malaysia. Only an estimated 500 remain in the wild. There are 55 Malayan tigers in Association of Zoos &amp; Aquariums accredited zoos in North America.  Name: Berani (pronounced Burr-ani) means “brave” in Malay; he was named by the veterinary staff at Tulsa Zoo.   Born:  Aug. 26 at Tulsa Zoo.  Birth weight:  Approximately 2.5 pounds  Current weight: 12 pounds, 15 ounces.  Parents:  Mother, Jin, 4; father Gahara, 7.   His litter: He was a single birth.   Why is he being hand-reared? He was not getting enough milk and his mother was inattentive, Tulsa Zoo veterinarians said.   Why is he coming to Point Defiance Zoo &amp; Aquarium? It’s best for hand-reared tigers to be raised together. They’ll acquire tiger behaviors from one another and learn to socialize and  behave in an appropriate way with humans and other tigers in zoo-based populations.  How different are Malayan tiger Berani and Sumatran tiger Dumai?   Malayan tigers are a bit bigger, lighter in color and lankier in body formation. They are native to the tropical forests of Peninsular Malaysia. The Tiger Conservation Campaign estimates that fewer than 500 remain in the wild.  ·   Sumatran tigers are the smallest subspecies of tiger. Their fur is a darker orange than that of Malayans. They are also the only remaining tiger subspecies that lives on an island.  They are critically endangered, and as few as 300 live in the wild.   **Dumai**  What is he? A Sumatran tiger (Panthera tigris sumatrae). Native to the Indonesian island of Sumatra. There are 74 Sumatran tigers in Association of Zoos &amp; Aquariums accredited zoos in North America and about 375 as part of the Global Species Management Plan. Only an estimated 300 remain in the wild.  Name: Dumai (pronounced doo-my). Dumai is a city in the Sumatran province of Riau. Members of the public picked Dumai in an online survey of six names submitted by members of the Asian Forest Sanctuary staff who care for the cub.  Born:  Aug. 22 at Point Defiance Zoo &amp; Aquarium. Birth weight:  Approximately 3 pounds.  Current weight: 14.2 pounds – a 425 percent gain since birth.  Parents:  Mother, Jaya, 9; father, Malosi, 4.  His litter: He was a single birth.   Why is he being hand-reared? Zoological staff and veterinarians decided to separate him from his mother when it was clear that intervention was crucial for his health. Within days of his birth, he was not getting enough milk, was dehydrated and his temperature was low. He is now thriving.   **General questions about the tigers**  *Is it rare for two subspecies to be reared together?* Yes. It’s not common, but it does occasionally happen.   *What do they eat?* Each of the cubs is fed a special formula designed to give him the nutrients he needs to thrive and grow. Their teeth are coming in, and they also are beginning to eat a type of ground meat.  *How long will they be hand-reared?*  It depends on the tigers’ growth and the zoological staff. Zookeepers will know when the tigers are big enough to thrive without round-the-clock attention. That likely will be when they are 4 to 6 months old and weigh around 100 pounds.  *How long will they live in the Cub Den?*  Until they outgrow it. Then, they’ll be shifted to the Day Room in the Asian Forest Sanctuary.  *How big will they get?* Each may reach 275-300 pounds when fully grown.  *Will Dumai return to Jaya or Berani to his mother at Tulsa Zoo?* No. The two cubs will remain together as “brothers” as they are cared for and shifted onto exhibit at Point Defiance Zoo &amp; Aquarium.  *How long will they stay at Point Defiance Zoo &amp; Aquarium?* That decision is up to Species Survival Plan® officials. Typically, they remain at their home zoos until they are sexually mature, which occurs at about age 3. Then, a decision is made about where to place them for breeding purposes to increase their numbers and maintain genetic diversity in the subspecies. Berani will eventually be mated with a Malayan tiger; Dumai with another Sumatran.   *Do other zoos have Malayan and Sumatran tigers:* Yes, but only two other zoos in the United States – Dallas Zoo and San Diego Zoo – have both.   *What are the threats to tigers in the wild?* Poaching and habitat loss due to human encroachment on their native lands.   *How can people learn more about the tigers?* Go to pdza.org for information on tiger conservation, awareness and fundraising efforts.
The feeling is usually mutual, regardless of whether or not either opinion is correct.
so it is not all for naught, a [former mime does a decent AMA] (http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/wvwv0/iama_former_mime_ama/) 
Thanks to the helpful advice of Benson, Ferris Bueller succeeds in avenging the murder of his father.  Mr. Roarke tries unsuccessfully to kill T.J. Hooker.
oh yeah Hernandez definitely. meant to taunt Chelsea fans because his life revolves around them
And I've heard parents get very angry when the bus drivers tell them to take their kids out of strollers and explain the safety reasonings behind it. 
Older than the internet, this picture is.
Definitely a hard class. Massive fail rate. I’m taking it right now without have taken the pre-req ( a.k.a. one year of high school chem) and i’m failing pretty badly.Try to take something else especially if it’s not required for your major 
Well..  They released a game under the name of [Warhammer 40K: Squad Command](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warhammer_40,000:_Squad_Command) to the PSP and DS a while back. I have only played the demo so I don't know much about it. But it is turn-based and quite fun.  So if you own a PSP or a DS, you should check it out.
[Rule of three](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rule_of_three_%28C%2B%2B_programming%29) has to do with dynamic memory and copying objects. If you create an object a, copy it into b, and then they both go out of scope you need to make sure they don't try to free the same memory.  Arrays allocated with new[] must be deallocated with delete[], not delete.
The key is to take the pressure off yoruself. Unfortunately, telling yourself not to be nervous is another type of pressure, so it isn't easy.  What are you nervous about exactly? Is there something in particular or is just a general nervousness?  I think it also helps to stop worrying so much about virginity. It doesn't really matter that much. The first time you sex you will probably be pretty nervous, and it probably won't be very good. The second time you will be slightly less nervous, and it will be a bit better. The third time you will be less nervous still. And on the fourth time, a wizard shows up and you have to use your magic erection to cast a spell on him (because you don't have a wand).  But seriously, it gets easier each time.
[Finally found it](http://www.oled-info.com/googles-new-phone-and-tablet-use-lcd-displays-not-oled-ones), it's an lcd screen instead of amoled.
good site
[*Dis maeg me zad*](/sadpucha)
speed: nobody gives a shit you can't fucking tackle him
Watching It's the Great Pumpkin Charlie Brown
downvoted because even republicans hate Bush?
First thing I thought was that that is not a natural color green, but went straight to the comments instead of looking at the picture for more than 2 seconds.   On second look, this is very obvious.
In which direction?
I am allergic to dogs, and can never spend very much time in their vicinity, much less be able to train one.   How do you even begin to teach a dog to do this?
&gt;probably not a good idea.  **edit:** fuck it do that shit!
I hope he dubbed James Earl Jones over himself.
the battle of the 2 shitty games
New starwars? What?
I couldn't agree anymore with you. It adds a nice back story as to why Connor feels the way he does.
Ohh my goodness. [Fabulous!](http://vimeo.com/8564338)
And so it was illuminated, the problem with American politics. It's either all or nothing, there is no such thing as the middle ground. Easier to make blanket statements about the efficacy of regulation, instead of addressing each situation in the unique context it presents itself in.  This isn't directed specifically at you by the way.
Cover him in pig's blood then shoot him in the head.
I wouldn't blame haters for hating. Its ruining that dirt road.
Awesome. 
my friend bought a cat for me.  It is a cat riding a tractor with a gun, a log cabin in the background, and my goat off in the pasture.  Shark Tank is how i learned of your product.  thanks.
press start, type the name of the game, right click its icon and select pin to start or pin to task bar.
honestly! That slut just belongs on her knees, doesn't she?
Yes, you are an idiot. How did it go?
Not hating or drama but the last part you didn't include was funny:  &gt; Alex Parker: Report Lee Sin plz, trash talk me all game  &gt; Chauster: Suck a dick
I love her.  Her full combo does a lot of damage, and her spider E is so fun to use.  I'm about 50% with her but that includes the first few days with her I had no idea what I was doing.  I think the low win rate just proves how high of a skill cap she has.  
The figure is GSC's 1/8 Melissa Seraphy (from "Wagamama Capricio").
Get a PO box and I'll have one shipped to you.  They're only a couple bucks.
Love the backwards idea!  might have to try that this year
cheap, easy and french do not really go hand in hand...lol jk   Learn the mother sauces.  Espagnole, Bechamel, Veloute, Hollandaise and Tomato.  with these there are literally thousands of variations.   learn, or perfect how to break a chicken down.  one person can eat for 4-5 days worth of dinners off 1 chicken.  
&gt; Want an efficient way? Pay waiters reasonable wages, that way nobody gets shafted. The bad waiters get fired now, since it's the employer who pays their salary now, not the customer, whereas you won't care if they all get below minimum wage.  All that does is insulate the waiters from accountability, since now the boss has to figure out that they suck, and it also means that the only remedy is the drastic action of firing them.  In what way is that preferable for anyone except waiters that suck at their jobs?  &gt; Want to punish a bad server? Complain to the manager, bad server gets fired instead of starving to death.  So you think bad servers would prefer to get fired than to get a bad tip?  Tipping allows servers to learn what is and isn't good service.  Firing is a crude mechanism to give people performance feedback.
...or if he did she would lose her shit (more, if that's even possible).
Thanks for the reference. Haven't read Dalton, it looks interesting.
[Anyone else noticed this the credits?](http://imgur.com/a/SuTYR)
Looks awesome bro! Keep up the good work :)
Well, considering how awful the AFC is this year it isn't that much of a stretch...
Dude, seriously, you're using an example from Desert Storm. ECM has come light years since then. The AC-130 is capable of defeating basically every MANPAD in existence today.   Edit: Also, the AC-130 was shot down with a land-based SAM, not a MANPAD, which is what the rebels would have. Yes, the two are different, with the MANPADs being vastly inferior in capability. 
For some reason I had a vision of you making a life raft out of pony ties.
On the 40E merge before the 2nd ave exit.
Any tips for a jungler? By that i mean, when do you feel a most vulnerable to a jungle gank and why?   Thanks and Good luck in the future:)
Yes, either cross the border to get it, or get a mailbox in Nogales so you can get stuff delivered there and then go from time to time to get it are our best options. The latter is what I do. Stuff here is expensive and crappy, and importing will become impossible in the next weeks (because of the ban).  Edit: explained a little more and corrected a few typos.
You can't attack or move while affected by this, it's not helpful at all.
I just put up the number flair, and I was thinking of doing the Rogers Hornsby logo that's up on the outfield wall. I decided against it because I couldn't find a good picture.
[](/shrubs1)
Stephen Jackson raps?
Maybe a dark turquoise or blue.  I love coral with turquoise. The black and gray tones with a few pops of color would be really pretty!
and you're saying this phrase was definitely proposed as a scientific principle and not a guideline to help give the layman an idea of how his or her decisions are likely to affect their health?
&gt;So why in the world would anyone be offended?  That's the thing: *no one* actually IS offended. It's that A LOT of people on this post are saying "dude, just go talk to her" or "ask her out" or calling OP a creeper for taking the picture, insinuating that he took the pic to ogle her.  Nevermind the fact that the bitch is wearing a Skyrim costume and that is what OP referenced. Nope. It's a picture of a non-ugly *female* so it's automatically sexual and therefor creepy.
Muscles Glasses from Epic Meal Time is going to be doing an AMA on /r/InternetAMA on November 3rd at 12PM EST if you're interested.
I've always loved Heath bars.  
[*my* **penis**](/bigalexis)
I loved Rabanastre, it felt so alive. I had a few problems with XII (didn't stop me pretty much 100% it :p) but the cities were incredible.
Not likely. If Player 1 appears to be making every effort to play in a timely manner, then he isn't in the wrong for slow play. If there is a serious concern about time even if this is true, I might ask both players if they would be okay if Player 2 or another third party shuffled Player 1's deck when necessary to move the game along, but this is a REALLY long stretch and I would probably have to have seen repeated issues with Player 1's disability consistently impacting his matches.
I haven't read this yet.... I'm going to log my reaction as I read:  This is going to suck...  Holy jeebus... why do smug assholes like this keep talking?  facedesk!  FUCK YES, REDEMPTION!
I tried asking if I could stream as well to promote the game but it came down to the amount of viewers I had I couldn't really care less its 4 days ill just wait 
I took the QM20, but the QM2 is on the same route. Honestly, it was not worth it at all. Getting onto the bridge and into Manhattan wasn't a problem, it was getting through queens! The traffic on the queens expwy was terrible.  And after bloomberg's speech today, I think tomorrow MAY be worse. Only cars with 3+ passengers are allowed on bridges which means countless cars will be turned away.  Some trains will be running, but those will be delayed too. I'm probably going to work from home tomorrow! Good luck!!!! Let me know how it goes! 
Great collaboration!
slept through hurricane bawbag myself and it didnt do a damn thing cept roll some trampoline along the street
Yeah, the title of this post.
I think you would also like diving a [missile silo](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FyS1zafLNkM)  or a [mine](http://www.2dive.com/btm.htm)!
Did he touch you?
I mean if you want I can show you every box score from my games. Some quick examples of my bad luck season - was playing packers D/ST the week they played the seahawks. Lost my game on the final play (golden tate TD). Two weeks ago I lost as Santana Moss and Dustin Keller combined for over 30 points, which is insane. I also lost because James Jones scored 2 TD's against me when I had foster score 2TD's but kept mostly under wraps in that game
Could you explain to me how you distinguish cis and trans women?
Both in game and real life unfortunately.... rep grinds were a PITA
So I went to Walmart today and I couldn't find any cards! I may go to another Walmart tomorrow but where would they be located? I checked the "toys" section. 
Same thing happened to me when I was helping a bunch of kids out at camp this summer... freakin' kids.
I'm having trouble locating the page that explains it. Is it under walkthrough? Or possibly DLC?
Aha, no. I'm familiar with one-piece and it's very different. One-piece is generally for humor and what-not. This 'unknown' anime is more grim.  Edit: It may not be Toasted TV, it's just an educated guess. I haven't an idea of any other anime networks during that time back then.
ignorance? Who in the hell would seriously call for banning free speech? Did like to hold your breath as a kid? Because you're brain damaged. You clearly don't understand what an ad hominems or fallacious arguments are so now I don't even give two shits about having a discussion with you, fuck off
More importantly how do I get [this Windows 8 thing](http://www.animenewsnetwork.com/interest/2012-10-11/microsoft-windows-8-2-new-japanese-moe-mascots-revealed)... it even comes with voices!  Anything else interesting on the store?
&gt;I'll go get working on a list of people who donated goods to the earthquake in Haiti so you can start harassing them as well.  Wow strawman too?  Look. The part I'm focused on is causing harm. When someone gives items like canned goods, blankets, clothing, etc, there must be processes added to the logistics, like making sure the food is good, cleaning and repacking the clothing, and in the end it removes manpower from real crisis intervention work. This is all I am saying.  Edit: Just to add, Romney knew about the rules, he asked the Red Cross to break them. So Romney, knowing that, still bought the shit, took pictures (can't take pictures with a big check after all, it'll look fake) and sent them that shit *knowing* that it's going to cause problems. The Red Cross is asking for money or blood. Anything else is just causing harm. I promise that food will sit somewhere in a warehouse probably never to be seen again.
Survivor Guilt and Midnight Hands are pretty good. But nothing can top Black Masks and Gasoline.
Nothing violent, just a little rough-housing.
The school out west? I usually refer to them as So. Cal as they deserve to be.
Pretty sure that battle ended a while back.
It's a video game it's sad that you have an addiction and even sadder that you think the Internet cares.
Too late, I've decided I'm not in a partying mood and I've wrapped myself up in a duvet and I'm having a movie marathon
Yes, [Reddit Enhancement Suite (RES)](http://redditenhancementsuite.com/) has this feature.
It doesn't take much confidence when your biggest competition has the Criabetic at QB
I believe man creates his own meaning through the choices he makes, but for the sake of argument let's say you're right. If existence is in fact meaningless, then there is no need to control. If no one's existence matters, then it certainly does not matter if people are engaging in violence or suffering as a result. The Templars therefore would be toiling in vain attempting to end these things, because they do not matter.  
Can you let me know what texture pack that is?  Thanks
you really are retarded if you think sorting and sending out $5k in supplies is detrimental to relief efforts in any way....and yes, they do accept supplies. this post and this subreddit have become overrun with nothing but ill informed jackasses trying to spin a good deed into something disingenuous. it really disgusts me. you want to criticize him, criticize him on an actual issue.
My last streak was 18 days and I know exactly what you're talking about and it's what killed it. I thought, damn this isn't hard to do, I'll go ahead and fap and make it to 90 next time. Don't fall for it, you're brain can be a dick :/
It's the go to destination for drunk teenagers.  "Hey Bro! Let's go break in the asylum and tell ghosts to suck my dick!" I have heard this exact sentence.
Bingo. It happens a lot more now than it ever did before, but that's probably to be expected since $200,000,000 budgets are more common than they were 15 years ago.
k, got a new battery,  the one I had was all dead, now I'm back to where i was last night, car tries to crank never actually turns over...
Glad you like it :) It's always nice to come to a subreddit that has a bit of colour.
This worries me.
Italy has a lot of tourists, it's kinda their thing. Have american tourists who tip for a couple of years? Well suddenly you know how to milk tourists from anywhere for a bit more cash.
It's eerie how unnatural that looks. Like a CG Patrick Stewart with kinda-bad mocap imposed on a 2D background. The weirdest part is knowing that it's not.
Oh, you!
i can make out *"immature little shit"*. but i'm not sure what that last part says.
Michael J. Fox should do an AMA
Yes, do tell! Wat, indeed!
Sorry Germany, no gold. How about some loans from China instead? 
Beep.
Funny you say that. We've been together almost 3 years, and I can't imagine marrying this girl. I think it's time I let her go, but honestly I'm having a hard time coming around to it. That's really what it boils down to. I need to grow some damn balls and just cut the cord.
Throw your old piss at them. 
One of the most hard-working and experienced personalities in the scene, who is also a great caster, does something which *in your opinion* was wrong, and now you don't want to watch him casting ever again?
The pictures in which you are smiling? I think those completely take away the "horse face" look, as you mentioned it. And so what you have a horse face? (If we are going to call it that.) Work with what you have there! It's good! Smile and be happy, you have nothing to really worry about.
Thank you!
That oop from Lowry to dd off a pick from Bargnani has become a set play. They ran it in the preseason too. 
removable storage  flash support (even though I hate flash)
I meant miners, not youth. A huge lot of miners only had a motorcycle license.
RIP Col. Bakerish, Maj. Svete and Cpt. Slink. They died this way for me in my classic ironman runthrough :(
It's half done, i'm leaving now to get drunk 
That is hilarious.   Although thats not where it happened to me (Whyte ave, Edmonton), being originally from Calgary, I know the Back Alley and it is a dirty dirty place. That doesnt surprise me in the least.   High five
Just tuning into "The Jeremy Beard Show"  How does James Harden look? I'm curious how much chemistry he has developed in like 3 days of practice.
I like Micheal Myers as a charector, I think i have the original somewhere so ill take a look! Thanks!
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: My reaction to all the costume pics on reddit right now... &gt;Meme: Angry Walter &gt;* AM I THE ONLY ONE AROUND HERE  &gt;* WHO DIDN'T BUY THAT HORSE MASK? &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3rl6m4.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/9Ic6A)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||AM+I+THE+ONLY+ONE+AROUND+HERE+-+WHO+DIDN%27T+BUY+THAT+HORSE+MASK%3F)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
I drink only water at home. I am too lazy to buy coke. Tap water is cheap and always available.
Watched this today in class. Awesome!
HELL NO.  Way too many cheaters.
Coltrane - Om
A friend of mine's young son called it the "flower gun".
She's plenty ugly but yeah this joke has lived itself out. I'd keep in mind that most lurkers, the ones responsible for bringing this shit to the front page, are more than young enough to find that funny.
Wishful thinking, he'll just slate Wenger some more. The smarmy cunt.
Yup 
Add another fuck to that... I was having such a good day.
You typed "However, I think my face was" before thinking "actually, I want to type "body language *and* face"", so you typed that in front but forgot to take out "face was" behind it.   So it turned out "I think my face was body language and face was...".
Antarctica, fuck yeah!
I liked it, but had a lot of trouble focusing on it... there seemed to be a lot going on at once.  "Oh look, a waterfall, cool! What's that on the screen of the device? Oh there are words too? Crap, they're gone now.  I wonder what they said."
Ah. Shame on me for not catching the sarcasm.
NSFW. Cmon!
All I have to do is take a yogurt out of the fridge and my cat comes running. It's his favorite, [especially peach!](http://i.imgur.com/g5VA4.jpg). He'll pester me until I give him a lick, so I usually let him clean out the tub once I'm done.
&gt; it is hard to judge reliability when someone isn't even reliable enough to take a job interview seriously  he showed up on time ready to discuss the job. That sounds reliable.  &gt; I would too, but not if they think they are doing me a "favor" by interviewing, that kind of elitist crap has no place in a team environment.  are you doing them a favor by interviewing them? I'm guessing you think yes.
I love it!!  You guys are amazing.  All this encouragement inspired me to start developing a new series today.  And I have two more for this series.  Lots and lots of new stuff will be coming out.  Thank you!!
if your gonna be a fucking parasite don't be surprised when you become unwelcome. its simply pathetic how a so many Muslims seem to think its ok to move to another country and shove their shit down everyone's throat, yet they they have the fucking nerve to complain of westerns occupying their country. i don't have anything against Muslims but if your going to pull shit like that, you deserve nothing less than being deported. You want to preach about how much of a faggot a country is for being gracious enough to accept you into their nation? have fun getting stepped on like the parasite you are.
More tracks, more tracks and.... More tracks  Spa, Montreal, Watkins Glen, Fuji, Sao Paulo, Mt Panarama etc. Or more fake tracks even just more tracks, thats all I care.
I don't. Heck I even drop by /r/conservative from time to time, and I don't do it to point my finger in disagreement. If you want to try and pin me on just one source, then go with the daily show. But a lot of the time I'll dig into something they mention and read more about it on reuters/cnn/politiken/bbc/google...  But since you bring it up, I'm now wondering where you get all your news from?
Sweet pipe! What's it's name? 
No problem! 
Because theme songs and intro sequences are 30 seconds that could go to story.
I fucking knew it. Also. I have been on reddit for the past 4 hours. All drunk. AMA
I'm surprised they didn't just do it in Wales.
Is it that hard just to move one seat over?
Yeah, but that won't help me until I've finished the song currently playing. I hate not finishing a good song.
35,809 servers. Am I reading this right? Holy shit. So it's not the server availability that's in question, but rather the players to fill them with x_x
FUCKING BULLSHIT!
I hope they add a 2v2 in league. I love 2v2 for when I just want to play with one friend.
Cheers. It's just frustrating, cos some people do tend to be patronizing, esp when I ask a newbie questions...like now lol. Can you tell me what happens when you loan a player to another club, but then they play their original club, can't they just play shit on purpose?
I never expressed an opinion, so you can't disagree with me.  Unless you're one of these people who just gets off on disagreeing, period.  EDIT: Just poked around your comment history a little.  My apologies, you sound absolutely lovely, not like the type that picks fights at all.
this is retarded
Yeah, I agree that it is a bad idea, it would be like Elder Scrolls:Oblivion Horse Armour all over again. I doubt people would buy it, DLC has come to far.
Our new big two is looking mighty fine.
Yes, you can thank the Republican's for appointing a horse trainer to the head of FEMA during their last administration, I agree it was a fiasco.
Well, that's true. Partially it's warding against possible impulse purchases, and the fact that I'm in a fuzzy financial situation with my fiancé that we don't want colored by credit problems. It's easier to keep track of one person's spending to avoid spending money we don't have, but since we're both sharing the same funds I don't want to "overlap" before we've balanced the books, accidentally.
skate tranny and wear kneepads 
Okay I tweeted to him... 
Update: We ended up suing the therapist and the hospital and we are now rich and her depression went away when the bills were all paid. Thanks reddit!   Lets have some closure.
*takes a bow*
Hopping on now, ~5 mins.
Being a dickhead's cool!
Cell = mobile. also, that sounds pretty sweet, ive heard about it, I am understand it wasnt bad, only woefully under/mis-marketed
It's all right, you can call me Bob. 
that's racist.
WAY too quiet in there. It's unnerving. 
Thank you, I'll probably buy it online just to be safe, I'd hate to get there and be turned away from maybe one of my only opportunities to attend a LAN LoL event.
That...was beautiful.
Hmm, wouldn't it be prudent to keep him and his followers in your country so that it would be easier to keep a watchful eye on them?
Who will post the dancing lobsters gif first?
Is there any way to prevent pop-ups on firstrowsports? I remember reading something on /r/nba about that.
DAE think that was George Lucas and John McCain at first?  edit: yep, lots of you did
So now your friend thinks that's how you come? LOL
No, like [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vi7QQ5pO7_A).
No, that is ALSO incorrect because it is "TEXT-DIALOGUE" which is a technique of speech pattern(s). You have to be REALLY smart to understand the emotional drive within the text by learning space/pauses/continuation's. So,   ----again , (did you see that spacing-that is a condescending pause) your mentally handi-capped; keep off the computer and stare at the walls more.
Why the Fuck would you post a picture like that of your friend? Seriously OP wtf
well i would love to help cheer you up :)
Nice to see how he's supporting the same general thing that people who were against civil rights were in the '60s.
Now kiss.
They were frozen? The freezer is the technology in front of that technology.
I did not think Tard could look any grumpier. And then this happened. LOVE &lt;3
didn't know ottawa had high-tech industry??
But sharks aren't fish.
My dryer must think very poorly of me because it's been doing this to me for years.
Maybe the gator can lend an arm.
Sure.
is the guy that made the youtube video that supposedly started all this, still sitting in jail?
hah.  reminds me of this time I was at the store - to get beer, probably, walked by this guy who slipped &amp; reached out to grab something to steady his balance - unfortunately, it was a rack of red wine.  down he went, along with the wine - at least 10 bottles broke, got all over his pants. I laughed my ass off.  poor fucker. 
I'm probably going to get downvoted to hell for this, but with my Therminator, I set up my entire system on brewday, run Oxyclean through it, then flush the entire system with water, then run StarSan. When I'm done brewing, I run Oxyclean through everything and then flush with water. I don't backflush. I don't bake it. I don't put it in a bucket. I haven't had any infections or clogging. 
I read that as both "typical Yahoo" and "typical [yahoo](http://education.yahoo.com/reference/dictionary/entry/yahoo)" lol. TBH didn't know the actual definition of the latter, but I knew it would kinda work.
did you want me to reference Ed, Edd, n Eddy?
innovative
True. I did try talking to her earlier, but she doesn't care for what I have to say. Mother knows best apparently and I'm just a typical teenager is what she thinks. I also did go outside and scream. Felt like a stretch for me. Thanks for your sympathy by the way man. You can always count on fellow Ents for anything!
Sweet dissection specimen!
Oh, eh.  He probably did exist in some form, though.
Question: how tall are you?
Thank you!
Cool Cool Cool. Add me on Steam.
So like, I literally have around 40 variations of this pasta stored up. I may dump if the temperature is right, the air density is pristine etc.  Also,  Okay, so you expect me to believe that you were the very best that your generation of Navy SEALs had to offer? I highly doubt that. If you were as good as you say you were, i don't think for a second that you would be browsing 4chan. This is mostly a place for jobless neckbeards that still live with their parents, and nerdy high school kids that don't have any friends. It really isn't the place for highly-trained assassins to be hanging out in their spare time. Even if it was, something far worse than a troll being mean to you probably would have set you off a long time ago. What about the slew of gore and child pornography that gets posted here on a regular basis? Isn't that something that deserves a person being hunted down and made to regret their actions? Yeah, you're just not the 4chan type. Sure, there's a wide variety of people that browse here, but you're far from the core demograpic if you are who you say you are (which isn't the case). Even if it were true that you're an incredibly talented soldier, I think all the military dispiline would prevent you from getting mad enough to murder some random idiot on the internet. I also doubt that even the best SEALs have a "secret network of spies across the USA". Why would all of the most expanisive Big Brother network in the world be willing to help a troubled PTSD-sufferer hunt down some random kid on the internet? That doesn't even make sense. If you're gonna try to scare somebody, make it more believable than "IM A SUPER SOLDIER HURR DURR". You might frighten a thirteen year old who doesn't know any better, but to must of us you just look like a kid with an anger problem and a very active imagination. Hopefully things will be easier for you when your puberty's over. Best of luck with that... kiddo 
Holy crap, you're dead on! 
I thought those were your nipples when I saw the banner, saved the best for last!
it's cool I yelled worse shit lol.  Just wanted us to stay classy.
So, there's this horse. And you can free any and all of the world's political prisoners, if you kick this horse to death in 60 minutes. If the horse is still alive after 60 minutes, then you get nothing. What do you do?
Remember when we said how easy Ipswich were going to be, then we lost away to them? Don't underestimate any team in the cup. Saying that, i think we're a shoe in for the cup now. We'll probably find a way to mess it up along the way but on paper, we should be alright.
I normally don't like HDR because people so often over-do it. But I love this picture and think that you did it extremely well. It's not overly done and definitely adds a lot to the picture. Props.
If its Verizon it could be a force bundle with a cable subscription from FIOS. Which would burn the company to the ground. 
I want one!
You do realize there are other factors that can influence which gene mutations are passed on with greater frequency, right? Natural selection plays very little role in human lives. There are still evolutionary factors at work within our species though. It really just comes down to who is having more children and therefore passing on a higher percentage of their alleles. Less intelligent people **do** have more children than more intelligent people. Therefore, outside of other limiting factors such as as a higher percentage of stupid people dieing before they can have children, our species is undoubtedly getting dumber.
I'm fairly convinced that the 7970 is the way to go. Since it works with MadVR, I have no need for an nV card, so the 7970 (which outperforms the 680, which is more expensive, as well as being more overclockable - moreso when I set up my WC loop) is the obvious choice.
The velocity of a comet and asteroid is typically enough to escape gravity wells.  Unless of course the spacial object flies directly into the planet.
[](/twifun) Anything?
Thanks! I figured if I didn't like how it came out I could always have it filled in.
Damn, plebs everywhere.
If you have small hands get the G400
I did that in this game eventually but could have done it earlier, normally it is a waste when there are normal waves and everyone can waddle back to kiosk with no time pressure. And when I have no-one seemed to use it.
All the precious karma you got. Your poor poor wife.   aww self post :(
He gets out and sings a magical musical number, pulling off his helmet and revealing himself as a Gungan/Ewok hybrid.
Wow. Yours are much better than the one I whipped up. https://docs.google.com/spreadsheet/viewform?formkey=dDJkVnhud0swR1g3aFlxQVd0VkhSTGc6MQ Is the one I made
halo 4 comes on at 3 am nyc time bro 
I am a 20/F/PA. Shoot me a private message :-)  I am a rather strange person, as well. 
scroll up. look at where i said  &gt; so go ahead and disbelieve the Gospels. that's your choice to make.  the "side argument" has always been the argument.  read more carefully next time before you fly off the handle, please.
Yeah, this falls under "Give me a break". Traffic is one thing; they really think people aren't going to *go outside* on Halloween night?
Personhood is irrelevant. The idea of humans being people or not people gave justification to slavery.  Life is a basic *human* right.
The same could be said of my third wife, Helga. 
Only if people stop dying.
Yes. Making a religious leader look like a fool in front of his followers is much more likely to get change than to create a martyr ;)
Just being fucking done. Being done with having this would-be amazing person trapped under layers of fat--being done with how people saw me, and how I saw myself. Seeing how the past 18 years had been spent being fat, and depressed, and vowing to myself to not spend another like that. (4.5 months in, 275 to 215, 18, M)
I really like this. Thanks for sharing.
I like the image and how work is symbolically shown as just another way to fight. Which it is. 
This is news to you?
Oh I realize Amon Amarth isn't satanic, Burzum sure as hell is, if you ask me Varg has honestly communed with demons. 
yes! We have a facebook group! Search "Doctor Who @ NCSU" -- there are about 230 or so of us. I'm one of the admins along with some other redditors :D
I think Alfred is underpaid haha
Honestly, I just heard the same thing being played over and over again with little variation.
Oh my gosh. This is crazy amazing!
So surprising that it has more votes here...
I like how when I mentioned this theory, I got downvoted to the bottom, but now all of a sudden, people are interested in it. Heh.
Your doggy looks so much as my family's old dog Zippy. I miss her. Thanks for bringing me back some nice memories.
&gt; Obama has no argument after the negative ads stopped working  Obama doesn't need an argument, I still wouldn't vote for Romney. Why should I discard the devil I know for some nebulous 'whatever-sounds-best' empty suit who can't clarify even his own positions? Let alone help put into power a party that seems to be having a dissociative identity disorder inner struggle between sensible centrists and crazed fanatical hijackers.
Best thing about this:   FULL NINJA TEAM! =D
&gt; Hey guys,  So we’re going to be doing a big reveal on this stuff soon, but I wanted to give you a quick gameplay peek of the next champion – the Shadow Ninja.  We’ve worked hard to make a cool gameplay loop that is really ninja-y and lets you be pretty clever. Let me run you through it real fast;  • He can make a stationary shadow of himself that then copies his skills when used. For example, you can throw a skillshot shuriken and he’ll also throw one. If they both hit, then you hit with two!  • He can swap places with his shadow to be elusive, set up ganks, or dodge skillshots  • All his skills can double hit!  • Yes, he uses energy  Shadow Ninja’s gameplay isn’t about deceptive clones, but instead copying himself to extend and increase his power or mobility. And since his moves deal with areas or skillshots, setting up the right positioning to double-hit and maximize your damage is really important.  OK theorycrafters…all yours!
Do you have any spare cash? If so, you could be having sex within an hour.
I hope to one day be able to afford to pay for 2 alts with ISK.. that seems crazy unrealistic at the moment for me. ha
aww... oh well....  thank you!
"Dad, are any of your friends still alive?"  "The smart ones...."
it's denzel washington
I knew God was a nasty freak.  You go God get some.
holy shit is that the hennessey venom gt?
Weird that their .357 and .44 bullets aren't gas checked.
Didn't even know that!  Now those "effeminate" comments from conservative media piss me off even more.
I like it. Frequent updates, great features, no issues.
You are now ready to go to all the cons and mack on all the skanky slave Leia's. GET TO IT!
What *you* need is the [innernette](http://video.adultswim.com/tim-and-eric-awesome-show-great-job/the-innernette.html)
Neat, thank you.
[It's opt-in here. Click for info on becoming a donor!](http://www.organdonor.gov/becomingdonor/index.html)
It's a shit disease/condition. A bit of hope though: My friend was a hopeless, worthless drunk 8 years ago. He now is a professor and travels the world in his time off. He credits it all to AA. 
A mirror of this comment in case OP actually does delete it: ___  [Higher-resolution version](http://www.heardcitizen.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/09/003.jpg) (4000 x 3000, 3468 kB) 1636%  *kukkuzejt (OP) may directly remove this comment by clicking [here](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=QualityEnforcer&amp;message=This+request+can+only+be+sent+by+kukkuzejt+and+it+may+take+up+to+5+minutes+for+the+comment+to+be+deleted.+Thanks+for+reporting%2C+and+sorry+for+the+inconvenience%2C+%3A-C.&amp;subject=R-t3_12erd9).*
[](/raritywhy) I wanted to watch movies and eat candy with other bronies!
My wife freaked on me cause I wanted to learn guitar, her words: "your so smart and can do lots of different thing and I can't do much and I wanted to learn guitar so I can have something" I bought her a guitar the next day and she stopped playing it weeks after and I started learning it myself and got pretty good. 
[I'll just leave this here](http://wh3.org/)...
I don't think you understand. I mean there's no way I can NOT be associated with the GSM community, because people will automatically associate me with it because I'm gay. 
what about using the /r/miamiheat design?
[video for reference](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bBXyB7niEc0)
&gt;"They" are trying to supress this and other issues so much they can.  Then why are "they" doing such a shitty job? I've seen a bunch of articles on this, youtube, videos, etc. Where's the evidence of a coverup?
I always found that the way OWS framed/talked about political issues was done in a way that  resonated with those who have been involved in Activism and have a knowledge of Leftist theory, but sorta came across as banal, academic, and at worst, incoherent, to the 99% they claimed to represent. For example, the Tea Party, despite being a product of Republican apparatchiks, Fox News, and the Koch Bros., actually did a pretty good job of giving the appearance that it was a true grassroots movement.
http://i.imgur.com/H1q8D.jpg  To me the bigger issue is the rise/deregulation of the Financial Services sector of the economy correlating to income inequality. "Making money from money" is a bigger issue than competitive goods/services providers.
I'm not telling
Not unless you can prove the timeframe it was available on your file share.
I second this man
Stop! Do not put on shelf or sell or another BILLION YEARS. Ugh, five whole fucking days.
I have never met another anime fan in real life.  The ones on the internet are hit and miss. Some members of the reddit community are a bit rude. Although I've also met some ones that are really great and we have had great conversations.
They are higher because everybody knew that the giants were going to win, and a long time Reds fan here, I wanted detroit to win because the damn giants had to beat us
I hate hate.
Gee... this is probably news to the members of [this organization](http://ashecon.org/) that nobody is studying health economics.   It is also news that economists have six figure incomes. I wonder if I can file for backpay for the difference?
Why would I pay to try it? There are no Microsoft stores around here. If you release crap you should expect to loose customers. If Windows Phone Delivered I might want a surface. But because iOS delivered I got a Mac. The UI is horrible. Windows 8 was made like BlackBerry's Playbook, it's set up to be not iOS, not set up to be a good OS. 
[Imgur mirror](http://i.imgur.com/ncGZN.png)
They also gave RE6 39/40....so yeah. 
I agree. I know everyone wants some random girl actress they find hot to play Leia, but in terms of resemblence, Maggie Gyllenhaal is actually pretty similar to a young Carrie Fischer.   Either way, I don't want MORE young Leia. Let's move on to new characters, and maybe keep the old ones as just periphery roles. I think Jaina/Jacen/Lowbacca/Tenel Ka and their adventures would make decent movies, with enough familiar faces to keep old fans interested?
Hah, I was in the beta for the game, still have my cd laying around somewhere.  To be fair, anything EQ related is pretty cringe worthy!
... dang. No kidding.
the right side. you were naked faster.
Atheist rage kept me drunk for a long time.
Beat in time consumed, but probably not earnings :(
It's just amazing how drivers of the day managed races with bus sized steering wheels....
i used to deliver milk to restaurants, stores, etc.  We used these hand-trucks to carry stacks of milk crates into the refrigerators.  This one restaurant at the jersey shore had a wall of these big containers of cooking oil stacked up along the wall of an already narrow hallway.  One day I ran into one of them with the blade of my hand truck and cut it.  The oil leaked squirted out all over the floor (probably 5 gallons worth) and the whole stack of oil on top of it came crashing down.  twas quite the mess.  luckily the guy in kitchen was cool about it and cleaned it up :-)
Muscles Glasses from Epic Meal Time is going to be doing an AMA on /r/InternetAMA on November 3rd at 12PM EST if you're interested.
Upvoted for riding in the cold *and* using a great quote!
It's Reddit here... That's like the highlight of the evening for a lot of guys here.
Without sharing personal information, it's hard for me to address this.  I have a lot of socio-economic advantages and I work very hard.  I have been in the office, working, for the past 45 hours.  I am not yet a member of the capitalist class, but that's a likely destination for me to end up.  I understand that hard work alone has not been enough to get me here, or the rest of the way.  I am extremely privileged.  You may be this privileged too.  I have never experienced hunger outside of fasting.  I have always known where I'll be sleeping.  No one has ever assaulted me.  I have always been safe.  I have never suffered meaningful discrimination.  I have never worried about paying a bill.  I have greater education, career training, and cultural exposure than the statistical average.  By all accounts I am privileged.  So when I look at my neighbor - a decent person with a criminal record and a highschool degree, a person with two kids and the same steady, long term partner, s person who can't get steady work and has had to move in with their parents, a person who just can't catch a break, but always helps the community - when I look at my neighbor I can't say that I earned mine and they earned theirs.  I know that I have been born and raised with a strong advantage, and my neighbor disadvantaged and raised only in the loosest sense.  Just because I was born on third base doesn't mean I hit a triple.  So it's not that impressive that I'm stealing home.
If we already have a military with training programs then why does the government [invest in video game technology?](http://arstechnica.com/gaming/2012/10/your-tax-dollars-at-play-defending-federal-funding-for-games/) Because it makes sense to use all the avenues of access available when forming the minds of our youth. 
I understood you were not a marketing manager as this would not be an idea that many would support due to that people don't want to spend money for unnecessary things but they will anyways cause everyone else does (Once again League of Legends skins a great example playing with people that has skins makes you wanna buy some yourself)  As for getting in store credit right away, doesn't that just take away the whole point of having people buy stuff? As you can only really use 3 skins and 1overlay/UI its only THAT much to be bought and prices can't be high cause then no one would buy outside of the initial credit and without it people wouldn't buy cause they don't want to spend more then the initial 75+60+60Dollars payed already for the game.  My own thoughts are that this would be a terrible idea which would only benefit Blizzard themselves, i think a system where you earn points with a formal as it is win(X)/lose(Y) * a game time looking something like this   Lets say X would be 1 and Y would be ,5. Game time in this instance would be 53minutes.   X*53=53  Y*53=26,5  This is how you would earn shop points or we can call it gold. And you get more the longer the game lasts. And double the amount if you win the game compared to lose it.
no. i was feeling pretty great about myself, so it wasnt time wasted
You CAN do this with trades, but I don't think the section sewing method I described above would work with them so you run the risk of losing a little more margin. The difference would probably be negligible compared to the small amount most trades lose anyway, though.
That's true right now for the 3DS, but that price is dropping fast.  Games start off at $35 or $40 as opposed to $60, and most console games require multiple copies for multiplayer now.   Sure, Borderlands doesn't, but you give up valuable real estate when playing split screen.  I totally agree, though, that fighting games and FPSs don't translate well to handheld consoles, but I love my puzzle games and RPGs, so that works for me.
Sounds like a Freudian Female Serial Killer's loot.
Honestly that bridge in the background looks way to **intact** for me to be the proving grounds.
How do you get Facebook ino pirate talk?
Lmao i had my name 'eat my ass', sad to they they didnt find that appropriate either.
The gist of the article is that win or lose, the teaparty is dead BECAUSE Mitt had to jettison all of their position to get elected (if he succeeds). Interesting point if you think that dishonesty doesn't count as political ideology: i.e., the new right ideology is that positions don't matter, just get elected by any means possible and then do your worst . . . the exercise of pure power without justification, i.e., fascism.
i'd slam my dong so far up her throat she pooped out a banana shaped like a dong because it's my dong coming out her asshole
Asik is so nimble
Yes haha. They're quite playful.
you can buy another dog or get one for free. you can buy another xbox but you can't get one for free.
does any of this matter when a cop just wants to be a dick
